
--------------------------------------------------------
bad camera  -149
1  Camera Front Camera very bad  
screen quality look stuning games playing smooth no hang or lagg at all camera average hope future updates may solve the issue and build quality extra ordinery in this price range.
Only One thing which I noticed is that its camera is good but as Letv makers have set very high bench mark  we have definitely expected high in this area also but here is only area were I was little bit get disappointed with both cameras specially front one.
Speaker quality is good and really loud  you will found few smart phone with such loud volume.
3. camera Quality is very very poor.
e. g. heating issues  battery drains very fast  software issue  camera quality not upto the mark  even cheaper phones have nice camera quality  screen is not as much good  its not crystal clear    THE MAIN THING IS THAT I REQUESTED TO RETURN THE ITEM BACK AS PER THE POILICY BUT THIS  WS RETAILER  REJECTED MY RETURN REQUEST  and says its normal if phone is heating up  But what about the quality it very poor  will never buy any thing from this seller.
Average front Camera 
 Great build  smooth UI  very good screen quality   camera quality in outdor good   camera quality in indoor ok ok for rear camera   poor for front camera.
Camera quality is average.
Camera quality is not good
Great mobile in 11k  but front camera is poor and RSM management is also very very poor
camera quality is not too good also.
camera quality worst.
5000 category with such bad front camera.
Main Camera is same like front camera.
Camera is ok and front camera takes really good selfies and I m not much worried about camera as i use my DSLR and can t expect much for this price.
This phone is truly budget effective but  I am totally dissatisfied with the camera quality and the display.
now come to phone  it has very bad camera looks like cheap 5 mp camera of any ordinary phone  touch was very good and performance was also quite good.
poor front camera 
 LeEco mobile camera not good  other function is good  other function is good.
 Good phone I have use it but camera quality is not so good.
Quality of 13 MB Camera is not good.
Day light shots from front camera is bad and those in indoor lighting and bit less lighting is pathetic.
For 5mp front camera does amazing selfie shots.
Some users said that the camera quality is bad in 
sound quality isnt very good .
got full charge in 80 min and camera is not too bad back camera is better than my zenfone 2 ze551ml but the front is really not good no comparison with zenfone 2 in front camera .
Phone is good   However software UI looks like basic China phone  No extra Option  No tweeks to UI Phone look premium  Camera quality is not that good.
Not satisfied 13 MP camera  its showing like a 5 MP like blurred picture  and front camera also not good  showing like 2 MP.
It allowes you to take the light from anywhere of the frame   the front camera still struggles but the back camera can produce good depth of field and background blur.
Camera quality is also good but  not very good in low light conditions but still it is acceptable.
Flipkart is bogus company  they sell mostly chinese product which are not in good quality.
Camera quality is not good.
Camera is good both primary and secondary.
camera is not up to the mark it struggle in low light also the front camera is not so good but outdoors picture quality is good 
5. camera quality is sharp and crispy.
a  Camera quality is just good  not so great.
Screen display and resolution quality is not good.
Do not buy if u think camera is good   Its below average as shown in its Pre.
Camera quality is poor  and Flash is also to poor 
Front camera is very poor.
only the camera quality is little dull.
 Nice but camera quality not nice 
Front camera is good   but not great for selfies  pictures get bit grainy.
Camera  Main camera is very good in good light and in very low light camera is average.
Camera not good.
Camera is not that much good as expected apart from this heat is problem.
overall the camera is good but not good as they claimed.
the phone do heats up  but not so high as said by many users  while charging i didn t see a huge difference between the phones temperature yes if you use your phone while charging  it will obviously heat up  any phone will heat up if you do that  buts its okay  its not a big issue in this full metal unibody phone  camera was average when i brought it  but after the update  i got a very good camera  its not so bad  its pretty good for selfies and outdoor shooting  also lowlight is average 
The 5MP front camera is the worst i have ever seen so far.
Can play big video files too without any issue with good quality.
it is overheating while charging and using internet phone become too hot with in 10 mins and back camera also not good 
Front Camera Quality is average.
Front camera is below average in low light but pretty average in light conditions and rear one is above average and keep in mind that it can improve via OTA  so dont be too anxious about it as its the first time for company and still camera is good.
I like the wide angle feature in front camera.
1 Camera quality poor.
My 2 cents are  if you want to own a phone with good camera and battery life  then you should not purchase this one.
Camera quality is very poor  indoor quality is very poor as compare to other competitor phone like k4 note
Camera quality is very poor  indoor quality is very poor as compare to other phone like k4 note
So I won t stress it more  though if one is looking for an exceptional camera quality  they should look for something else.
This phone is not that great and camera quality is bad  in low light captured images are dark  insufficient flash for capturing images in low light.
2. camera quality is not good in low light.
No heating but the front camera is avg but back camera is really good.
Camera quality is very bad with artificial light  even you have good lighting in Indore .
Camera is not good  I agree.
all over good But camera is Not good 
good camera not awesome.
good phone for 11999  no major problem  slight heating issues are there but not that much  rear camera is good after update  but still the front camera is pathetic.
camera quality is normal  not too good .
everything is all right but camera is not good  sensor is good  speaker is fadu.
 Vrygood phone u can use it for gaming and surfing but camra quality is not so good  
However  it has plenty of issues  like a kernel that ends up eating into the battery life  camera and call quality issues.
but camera quality is poor  like 5 mp only
overall product is good but camera quality is very poor even u have to provide head phones with mobile 
If you are looking for a phone with good Camera  I would strictly advise not to take this phone.
2 Camera quality not great but not too bad.
 The camera quality is very bad and even mobile gets heated near about 38 to 45 degrees in all remaing cases like battery stand by and performance this mobile is far better than any other mobile in this price segment 
Call Quality is too good and loud although the speaker phone.
poor quality of camera.
BUT  it seems that i took many photos but they didnt came that much good as LeEco promised  the FlagShip Le1s is obviously has a good camera but the Retail unit is very disappointing as the picture was not sharp enough and that is not an a high quality 4k video  as well as the Slo Mo is ok ok type Resolution  but the HDR mode did some great photos.
Front camera is just an average one.
The camera quality is very pathetic in low light conditions.
camera not good as you expected .
camera quality is worst nokia basic model mobile camera is very good to compare this iron box.
Except front camera  heating problem it is way better than any phone in this range 
FM radio not available  Camera quality very poor as per specifications.
bakwaash pis he mat lenee playstors work at only whifi camera is not good 
5  Camera   Camera quality is really bad and the recorded 4k video is well played in phone but having problem while playing it in laptop.
Well truly both the camera quality is not comparable to other better company s 12mp and 5mp models.
Camera quality is average  considering the specs like ISOCell and PDAF tech.
There are some minor issues like fast battery discharing  call quality  avg camera and heating issues while playing games  sometimes during phone calls and charing as well .
Call quality good.
I try to use and try to rectify from customer service about my camera goes black in front as it was crack in front and battery is heated like an iron.
2 front camera very good.
Camera quality is also not good both front and back .
2. and the next disappointment is that i Didn t expect from This phone as there many reviews or videos about the Camera 13mp shooter they say that the rear camera is pretty sharp and can take a good quality photo better then the other 13mp camera phones in market.
Camera is not good even it cant match with 2 MP nokia phone camera
Poor camera  very bad camera quality rear as well as front.
front camera is poor in artificial conditions
So  I am truly disappointed by the build quality as it costed my more money which makes me think  I could have gone for samsung  lenovo or other known good brands.
I thought the camera is not of good quality at first   but after an update  it completely transformed into a mature 13MP shooter.
5 MP camera is good but not the best.
The other thing is not good a camera.
 phone is nice looking camera is low quality but heating issue when charing 
Very good mobile with very average camera.awesome camera  161
Touch is excellent   camera is quite good   Videos extremely good.
Speaker quality is good and really loud  you will found few smart phone with such loud volume.
Picture quality is excellent and iu is good 
e. g. heating issues  battery drains very fast  software issue  camera quality not upto the mark  even cheaper phones have nice camera quality  screen is not as much good  its not crystal clear    THE MAIN THING IS THAT I REQUESTED TO RETURN THE ITEM BACK AS PER THE POILICY BUT THIS  WS RETAILER  REJECTED MY RETURN REQUEST  and says its normal if phone is heating up  But what about the quality it very poor  will never buy any thing from this seller.
Video camera is also good 
Camera quality is bad and cannot use for playing games and browsing  it will heat like anything.
camera quality is good  
Camera quality is good 
Some of them are impressive fast charging built quality fingerprint sensor infrared sensor and finally there are some good features in eui interface in spite of having some bugs 
 Great build  smooth UI  very good screen quality   camera quality in outdor good   camera quality in indoor ok ok for rear camera   poor for front camera.
The charger quality is very good and charges the phone at a good speed.
 Good phone with great display but camera is poor also betory dont last single days 
Camera is good  If u know to click pics .
first about the camera it s soo good
f  The sound quality is also very good.
all over the phone quality is very good.
i the camera quality is a very third class i have seen so far in a budget phone  i feel event the mircromax devices used to provide a decent camera quality.
good camera after update
4  sound is good equalizers   i used MI earphones   dts sound quality 
Front camera scores better than the primary one.
It feels premium quality and very good touch.
2 gig and well a good camera.
The camera is decent and clicks some good photos.
Video quality is good  slow motion videos do look good enough.
The selfie camera is also good but low light pics aren t that great.
Back camera Good but front camera is too bad .
Sound Recording Quality is also good.
camera should be good.
call quality is good 
Its good camera  all you ve to do is change default camera setting.
Camera quality is not stunning but not disappointing too.
cam quality is good.
overall the camera is good but not good as they claimed.
camera when compared is also same  not that very good  just a 2  difference i would say  
Camera is good.
Initially the phone looked very promising with brilliant build quality and good specs.
Very nice good quality good battery and all features are speechless  
Audio quality is good  when a good set of earphones are used  I usually use a ipod to listen to my music but this phone does sound good and it has a far better sound output through the jack than the Oneplus One.
camera looks good.
5MP front camera taken slefies are good too 
Camera is good can be better especially under low light.
Camera is good both primary and secondary.
don t buy this mobile  camera is like 5 MP rear  and front 0.
Great display  super speed processor  premium feel  camera also good after two software updates.
Comming to Camera part  both rear and front are decent.
Other than that  I feel this phone has some good features like finger print  5 seconds to unlock  Camera quality is not bad.
front camera is too bad  fingerprint scanner is not working properly    most important Filpkart will not refund you.
 Quality is good.
 Today i got the phone  using it since last 2 hours  nice design  and no lagging  camera also good for me.
Good camera   Only with day light.
Phone sound quality is also good   clear
Camera is good  Day light camera is awesome   dim light is ok ok   front is ok ok but day light photos are awesome also provides you blurred effect if you know how to focus things correctly
Le 1S is a mobile with all good features like camera pixel  storage capacity and a sound quality is good.
This phone is not that great and camera quality is bad  in low light captured images are dark  insufficient flash for capturing images in low light.
Camera  Main camera is very good in good light and in very low light camera is average.
My expectation with this phone was to have good call quality  performance while browsing  dispaly and decent camera.
Sound  Mono Speaker  still the sound quality is good.
camera good processor excellent 2.
its not camera fault or low quality camera 
got full charge in 80 min and camera is not too bad back camera is better than my zenfone 2 ze551ml but the front is really not good no comparison with zenfone 2 in front camera .
8 10 Sound quality is very good.
  Sound quality is good.
the phone do heats up  but not so high as said by many users  while charging i didn t see a huge difference between the phones temperature yes if you use your phone while charging  it will obviously heat up  any phone will heat up if you do that  buts its okay  its not a big issue in this full metal unibody phone  camera was average when i brought it  but after the update  i got a very good camera  its not so bad  its pretty good for selfies and outdoor shooting  also lowlight is average 
If you are looking for good camera phone .
2 front camera very good.
 Not good battery back up worst  heating issues poor camera heavy weight 
Camera quality is very poor  indoor quality is very poor as compare to other competitor phone like k4 note
However front camera is still not up to the mark.
 very good quality and performance.
Camera quality is very poor  indoor quality is very poor as compare to other phone like k4 note
To feel the 100  power of it  use a good quality headphones and play 1080p trailer in youtube.
Good built quality 
camera was ok. displaywas good
No heating but the front camera is avg but back camera is really good.
The display quality is really good.
Beat phone and good build   great camera good amazing processor 
Over heating  Vibration  poor camera quality  uncommon charging point.
Audio quality is very good.
good phone for 11999  no major problem  slight heating issues are there but not that much  rear camera is good after update  but still the front camera is pathetic.
Nice mobile  good camera  good resolution screen  ultimate good budget phone 
good camera with various options.
Audio   Using JBL ear phones quality is pretty good with all the details in the sound is good to hear
But coming to the camera its very good in outdoor conditions and take good shots but it works a little bit down in dim light conditions.
 Good camera
2 Camera quality not great but not too bad.
1s phone has very good quality  initially it had heating issue but the same is now reduced with update 
A good quality smartphone with excellent flipkart customer service.
Finger print feature is very good  audio and video quality is also good.
1 camera is average but not good as compare to build quality but as per price it is good  2 battery problem not there u can use it for whole normal day.
Camera quality is pathetic and its not even near to 13MP Rear  and 5 MP  Front  specs.
Battery back up is satisfying  camera is good.
Good camera quality both front nd Back
Camera is good but unlike any high end phones.
Camera is really good compared to other flagship devices in this range.
 The camera quality is very bad and even mobile gets heated near about 38 to 45 degrees in all remaing cases like battery stand by and performance this mobile is far better than any other mobile in this price segment 
Camera is also good.
Camera is ok and front camera takes really good selfies and I m not much worried about camera as i use my DSLR and can t expect much for this price.
2. camera quality is good.
it s front camera and back camera is not very well.
Horrible Camera specially front and slight heating issues as well   rest all seems fine since i have not used it much.
but as view of my opinion  camera is good as samsung or i can say better than samsung 
Quality of the pics in outdoors are good   indoor quality is nice with little noise in the pics shot.
The Good  1st of all the build quality of this one is spectacular.
camera quality is worst nokia basic model mobile camera is very good to compare this iron box.
if you want a good camera phone and expandable memory .
Camera is good enough.
FM radio not available  Camera quality very poor as per specifications.
Sound from external speaker is good quality
battery is good  look and feel awesome  camera both front and back are good in day light   at night average  performance is the excellent .
Build quality is very good
camera is bad   do not buy it for camera purpose   .
 its a good phone at this price except heating problem  camera quality is also ok ok. good looking.
Above two things disappointed me a lot since as an average mobile user I mainly need a phone with good battery life and good camera quality.
Camera quality is excellent.
Front facing camera is about as good or as bad as the rear one and it is also a hit and miss situation.
2. and the next disappointment is that i Didn t expect from This phone as there many reviews or videos about the Camera 13mp shooter they say that the rear camera is pretty sharp and can take a good quality photo better then the other 13mp camera phones in market.
camera quality is nice and picture quality also good.
In this price this awesome no lag good camera good battery .
Good quality charger and the cable but no head phones  
Build quality is very good with a crystal clear picture clarity.
Camera little bit dispointing but my self ok. Paisa wasool mobile best in this price   after ota update camera quality increase and i dont hate heating issue.
Indoor is OK but outdoor quality is good.
If you want better front and back camera then don t even think of buying this cell.
Camera quality is good enough for both selfie and stills.
Heating was another big problem camera quality was poor .
Camera quality also very good after the recent update.
 Nice camera  good picture quality  good speed  sturdy n sleek metallic body overall good phone 
--------------------------------------------------------
bad performance  -31
Phone is good speed and overall performance is awesome but as per the expert reviews and all my phone is not at all working like that.
Camera   Best but low light performance is at par
Low light performance will not be good as expected.
Overall I am quite satisfied with the performance and I would recommend it to others.
Very fast performance wise and sound is just great when u have combination with JBL .
both front and rear camera could have been little better in performance  need software optimization .
But some areas are below average performance.
Performance is also good not lagging.
Low light performance is average but can be improved with MM OTA update.
The battery performance is good with fast charging
 Good and sleek phone  but very bad performance in terms of camera  battery back up and heating issue after 2 mins use  Mobile or iron box  .
Seamless performance.
After using 3 days I am very disappointed with the performance.
IT S AN OCTACORE and with AN ALUMINUM BACK for crying out loud  What would one expect when the processor is tweaked for high performance  Fools like these should go back to using their  not so  smart phone.
  Battery performance is pretty good and it does not quick charge.
fast performance with ultimate processor.
Also after the update Fingerprint scanner performance was also poor and working one time if tried 3 times.
Camera has average performance.
Low light performance is good.
Battery  3000 mAh battery giving a bad performance  life is very short.
overall performance is excellent.
Battery Performance is too Good.
Camera quality is above expectations  though low light performance is bit letdown
Yes  Every body says Low performance camera.
Being a loyal customer at Flipkart since long  I had a legitimate expectation that when we are not happy with the performance of the product  we can return the same within the given time frame of 30 days and the same policy is also prevailing in other online trade  e. shopping.
performance for cpu very good you will feel that apps open very fast.
On the next day  having being faced the similar unsatisfactory performance of the product  I have lodged the return request on 05.
Still battery performance was poor.
Performance  It is very smooth not felt any lag.
Overall performance is good and value for money.great performance  83
Good performance in almost all features.
Phone is good speed and overall performance is awesome but as per the expert reviews and all my phone is not at all working like that.
When ever I make a call on the road or in the office  people look at me and praise my phone as well  Its well build with performance is also good  and after update of UI  the heating issue is also decreased.
8  Phone performance is really good.
Low light performance will not be good as expected.
 Good product with good performance.
I am happy with the mobile performance.
photos clicked r so clear n better performance by phone.
Good job Good metallic build and smooth performance.
Overall phone gives superb performance  More value to money what we paid.
performance is very good  
worth for 10 grands gives more than any other co. had ever given till today and hardware performance is outstanding s w performance needs to be refined.
speed and performance is also good.
High Performance  Thanks to 3 GB Ram .
Touch performance is Wow.
Excellent touch  display  Elegant looks  good performance in all games  except a few  
pros  good design and comfortable to hold  good performance and the fingerprint feature is good too
Best performance in the price range  54k antu score on par with nexus 5x.
High performance
Overall I am quite satisfied with the performance and I would recommend it to others.
 ok performance .
Nice performance.
Good Performance
but  le eco have to improve his eui for better ram management and better performance.
It s really awesome especially the price tag and unmatchable performance and going to rock indian market very soon.
After receiving this device I did a factory reset as suggested by some users   customer service reps for better performance.
Great performance camera sound ui.
perfect performance 
The battery performance is good with fast charging
You will get either equally better or even better performance  while saving a lot of cash   .
The performance is been consistently good.
This one is unmatched quality and unmatched performance.
10 days of use and i am very happy with performance.
EUI feels and performs like the IOS without any stutters or lags in performance at first you might dislike the UI but as you spend some time on it it will grow on you.
10 10 Excellent performance  no lag at all.
The LeEco Le 1s is a great smartphone and certainly impressed us with its performance  which was similar to what we experienced on its bigger sibling  the Le Max.
superb performance no lags at all
Soo good hardware design and OS should be updated to reach optimum performance.
Overall this is the best phone in this range  if you want something better then go for the lenovo vibe x3  it has similar performance but better camera  better speakers and of course a higher price tag.
Performance is to good.
Good performance.
The camera performance under fully artificial lighting come out to be a little noisy if u dont have a very stable hand.
Performance is very good.
This thing is mind blowing here according to me one thing that impressed me so much is the video quality it feels like we are watching 30fps videos at 60fps kinda multitasking is great gaming performance is amazing as i played Asphalt 8 and Mortal Combat at high visuals
The memory performance is also good
Factory Reset is must for first time  Which gives better performance like heating issue and Ram Usage.
now come to phone  it has very bad camera looks like cheap 5 mp camera of any ordinary phone  touch was very good and performance was also quite good.
The difference in performance is very much.
The Helio X10 along with 3GB of RAM make a terrific pair and deliver pretty smooth performance overall.
Happy with the performance.
 It actually doesn t matter how good the phone looks and even if the performance is ultimate if I am not able to use the mobile for more than 5mins.
The performance is great with no lag or freeze.
its buttery smooth in daily performance with its killer looks  yes the only con is bit low battery backup but thankfulky it comes with fast charging .
Excellent Product with Great Build quality and amazing performance.
performance is really good.
Snappy Performance  The Helio X10 certainly lives up to its name I did not encounter any lags while browsing and watching videos or just scrolling through.
 This phone is amazing I like it ram is very good and performance is superb 
Low light performance is good.
Best performance.
Performance is Good no Lag .
best mobile phone till now with 11 000 and great performance 
So far so good with performance   battery   display and sound.
superb performance best in quality.
The Le 1s will give you a brilliant looking device with a fantastic display  near perfect software experience with awesome performance.
performance is good  no backlog has haapen.
performance for cpu very good you will feel that apps open very fast.
overall performance is excellent.
Only look and performance is good  otherwise you will get many good options in same price range.
On the next day  having being faced the similar unsatisfactory performance of the product  I have lodged the return request on 05.
Performance is much faster and a cheapest phone.
Amazing look and good performance.
very good performance.
Performance is pretty good and it is comparable to many other flagship phones out there.
Phone performance is very good
I wanted a good performance phone.
Extraordinary performance.
Overall performance is good and value for money.
--------------------------------------------------------
worst battery  -50
Batterly life is not bad but not good.
Most people with regular usage will find its performance in real life usage quite good.
Good to use  only issue is battery drains within 4 hours of full usage.
I am facing full of heating issue from the mobile and rear cam is not good and battery is not stable.
Personally after using it two months I believe that battery life is also average.
and coming to the battery  battery life is not enough for me  as i am a heavy user  but fast charging makes it enough  its charging speed is superb  within 1 hour i get full battery i. e. 99  
Though battery life was somewhat low on initial days  but now  I get decent battery life that lasts for 1 whole day.
You might get more battery life and less heating issues post doing it.
Battery 3000mah battery might not be as mighty as you think I can get almost a day on light to medium usage but the company claims they will fix the battery problems with an ota update scheduled for 21st and also the fast charging helps here to compensate for the avg battery life.
I also forgot to inform that the battery life is poor.
The phone has an average battery life  But  the phone charges amazingly fast.
For an average user like me the battery is overall good which could last for entire working day.
Battery backup is also not good as expected
 Excellent phone but battery  backup is not good  and it is  heater  also.
Battery life is low 
The battery life seems to be decent too  giving me 4 to 4.
battery is not good
Ram management neee to be improved   battery life and camera also 
Battery drains very fast  with in 4 .
A great camera that supports 4K video recording  a super fast fingerprint sensor and great battery life with fast charging support  fast charger included .
Because of the poor battery life the whole Premium feel of the phone gets lost.
battery drains bit fast like continuous 3g usage it comes for 8 hours and if u watch videos continuously it comes for 5 hours.
 Goodlooking phone but battery not good and heating as well.
1 camera is average but not good as compare to build quality but as per price it is good  2 battery problem not there u can use it for whole normal day.
Battery  3000 mAh battery giving a bad performance  life is very short.
Lenovo K4 Note is for those who want better speakers but can skimp out on the performance  in the same price range  honor 5x is for those who want better battery life  a little bit better camera and can deal with a laggy interface  and as for me  personally  I can t deal with a phone which whimpers on its way to my facebook page.
The phone however does not have a good battery life.
Howevr the quick charging facility makes up for its average battery life.
battery is good but not for all day gaming and usage.
but it s battery not good.
Battery life is very poor.
 I purchased this phone in first sale  Phone performance is very good but battery back up is very poor  I have to charge this phone at least 2 times in 24 hours  also phone heats a lot while doing anything like surfing  gaming  watching videos.
Battery  Till now I find Battery life is also good.
Though Le1S boasts of 3000 mAh Battery  its very ulterior when compared to normal smart phones.
And also discharges even in stand by mode as well  as it drains during the sleeping hours   have low battery indicator in the morning.
12  Battery life is same like other Android devices.
Note  Life of any mobile is maximum 2 years  so I am not interested to put more money on mobile.
Excellent battery Life  every one says it has poor battery life idk why they say but when i received this fon i formatted this fon and now battery   can give you continuous usage of more than 5 hours although it also has batter resistant mode  
The camera is good  battery backup is outstanding and it charges really fast.
6 10  The battery drains fast  but will still last for a day with moderate usage even with 3G ON  
 this is not a phone its completely a phone which works with more powerful fingerprint   it has a good battery backup   and a POWERFUL XELIO X 10 PROCESSOR   3GB OF RAM WITH 32 GB ROM 
 Not good battery back up worst  heating issues poor camera heavy weight nice battery  72
Batterly life is not bad but not good.
Battery  The battery life is good and will last one day on normal usage.
For an average user like me the battery is overall good which could last for entire working day.
Battery backup is very good.
nice battery life.
Battery drain  Though the battery is of 3000 mAh  it is no good than a 1000 mAh one.
 Its a worth and good mobile  all fetures and battery backup is very good.
He said give mobile some time to settle down it will surely show some good battery results also fast charging starts to work.
Battery life is good and the charging is pretty revolutionary with high speed charging.
Battery will be good after some cycles.
very stylish and good battery backup.
you get good battery life.
Though battery life was somewhat low on initial days  but now  I get decent battery life that lasts for 1 whole day.
Decent battery life 
Finally looking at specs I thought a 3000mah battery should be good enough and bought this phone  but w. r. to battery this phone will definitely disappoint u if u are using 3g BSNL network in Bangalore.
 Its look and performance are very good  battery also satisfactory  both camera quality is so good  overall system is very good for me.
Good battery Life
For a regular use  this phone is pretty good even battery is upto the expectation.
 Awesome great le 1s this present situation with reasonable price good camara good battery  good display  overall performance is very good loving this mobile thank you le Eco bring more good devices to India .
Battery is good enough.
battery is quite good.
At the same time  it is hard to recommend anything apart from the LeEco Le 1s in its price range because you have smartphones with better 4000mAh battery life like the Huawei Honor Holly 2 Plus at Rs 8 999  but sports an average design  that sit below it  and the OnePlus X with a Qualcomm Snapdragon 801 chipset  thats not as powerful  that now weirdly sits higher above at Rs 16 999.
 Very good design phone with excellent battery.
The battery backup is also good.
Battery  Camera   heating issues but would say that the performance has been so far good in terms of battery   no major heating issues observed.
Extremely good battery.
heating problem battery is good 
 Have been using this phone for over a month overall phone is good  good battery backup  display is good  finger scanner works well  minus is phone gets heated while using maps  network connectivity is bad some time phone needs to be restarted.
Above two things disappointed me a lot since as an average mobile user I mainly need a phone with good battery life and good camera quality.
Battery is Good.
Phone is good but if u use continuously for 20 25 mins it get heated battery back up is good .
A great camera that supports 4K video recording  a super fast fingerprint sensor and great battery life with fast charging support  fast charger included .
Battery backup is good .
The battery holds good for one day but I wud largely recommend you to carry a power bank if you consume large amount of data.
Battery Backup is good
Battery backup is good.
Battery backup also good.
Battery is good with 3000 mAh.
Some of the apps crashes  the battery life is poor  but for me the main problem is that of overheating  if you use applications like uber and then call  you can notice that temperature would have gone up to 37 to 39 degree celsius  do you think you can use the phone to make a call during that time.
the handset is amazing  operates flawlessly  good battery life and no major heating problems so far.
a part from camera  battery backup is good and mobile process also nice.
screen resolution is good  battery is ok. charging is fast.
Also  battery life was quite decent with the battery saver modes.
Battery life is good .
Good battery backup.
Battery  Till now I find Battery life is also good.
2 Battery life is ok 
 good battery life actually.
 Decent Battery Life .
Battery is good 
TYPICAL 3000MAH BATTERY LIFE  BATTERY LASTS FROM MORNING TO NIGHT FOR MEDIUM USERS  MORE CALLS  LESS INTERNET  MAY BE THIS IS A CON FOR SOME USERS.
Good Battery back  smooth functioning  great display  sound 
Excellent battery Life  every one says it has poor battery life idk why they say but when i received this fon i formatted this fon and now battery   can give you continuous usage of more than 5 hours although it also has batter resistant mode  
The camera is good  battery backup is outstanding and it charges really fast.
I am not a Wild life photographer or some sort  but decent pics cant complaint.
 I purchased this phone in first sale  Phone performance is very good but battery back up is very poor  I have to charge this phone at least 2 times in 24 hours  also phone heats a lot while doing anything like surfing  gaming  watching videos.
Good battery backup
--------------------------------------------------------
bad display  -29
Display is not that great  
Also i broke the display  I was asked to pay 6k to replace the display  I have downloaded a home key app and i am continuing to use the phone since the damage on the display isn t much and only the home key  back key are not Working.
e  Display is very appealing.
first of all the phone looks premium with bezel less display but a little heavy as i found 
Awesome display The display is crisp and gentle on the eyes and it provides good readability in sunlight but not the best sunlight readability
in this phone only display is good and nothing is else.
 Good phone with great display but camera is poor also betory dont last single days 
Display  clarity excellent  brighting very good  colour reproduction awesome   haven t seen such good display im budget phones .
 Awesome great le 1s this present situation with reasonable price good camara good battery  good display  overall performance is very good loving this mobile thank you le Eco bring more good devices to India .
Biggest plus is its awesome display  and the build quality of this phone  camera is average nothing special battery back up is also decent nothing to boast about.
Dont think too much comparing specs  for the price  this is the best deal out there with great display and battery.
Display is too good  best you can get in 5.
Average  Screen display in sunlight
Display is poor
display also poor.
Display is again average 
Display is very sharp and has good colour reproduction.
Sharp   Clear Display
Phone fell down from just 4 feet from hand and cracked shattered display.
Turn it on  and its hard not to appreciate how good the display is.
Display  Display is crisp and sharp.
They found a negative result who proofs a defective display in the phone so they accept my replacement and Flipkart once again delivers a very fast service to replace my phone.
Display is sharp and bright.
Display is average
A very good build quality and a great display not excellent but will satisfy you if you want to watch movies or play games which have display quality of HD1080p  
Even display is not superior it is very dull   camera clarity is totally waste as it does not give pure resolution.
Display is too good.good display  62
Display is perfect.
Display is awesome and viewing angle is super good.
The colors do not look natural and display lacks apt amount of brightness making it an average one in sunlight.
Display is OK
Also i broke the display  I was asked to pay 6k to replace the display  I have downloaded a home key app and i am continuing to use the phone since the damage on the display isn t much and only the home key  back key are not Working.
The experiance is even alleivated with its amazing display and the fingerprint scanner which I remind you no other phone givs u at this range.
The Le 1s will give you a brilliant looking device with a fantastic display  near perfect software experience with awesome performance.
Display  Display is crisp and sharp.
1. display is good.
Excellent Build   processor and memory as well as excellent display etc.
5 inch full HD 403 ppi vid colour display with Corning gorilla glass 3 protection.
The display is vibrant and feels premium.
with crisp display and color reproduction.
Good display  Design  Sound  aesthetics   above all IR blaster  Type.
HD display is awesome.
Display  clarity excellent  brighting very good  colour reproduction awesome   haven t seen such good display im budget phones .
The phone look and display are awesome but it disappoints at battery front which drains very quickly .
Great display  super speed processor  premium feel  camera also good after two software updates.
display is excellent.
Xiaomi has poor body while LeEco has shing metal body plus wonderful display.
Very good display better than all my previous phones  galaxy s2 and htc one x .
Display is great.
5. inch display and it is currently the best display in this segment.
There is an issue with the mobile display  when using the mobile under sunlight it starts flickering  some random tap happen internally automatically and touch doesn t work.
Amazing full HD display and clearly visible under sunlight when auto brightness is enabled 
Turn it on  and its hard not to appreciate how good the display is.
 Very good full HD display 4G with dual sim hight level Hd graphis 
Has a very good display.
Good display
 Pros  full hd display is good.
Good  Display  Fingerprint sensor
Display is gorgeous
Display is good 401 ppi and 1920 screen
3  display is awesome smoothly play 1080p videos and graphics  
Display is good.
Display is the best out of all
Excellent display.
Good metal body n good display 
Display is fine.
Display is also good.
9 10 Excellent Full HD display  smooth touch.
In my pockets in normal pressed display is crack.
10 10  All high end games like Asphalt 8  dead trigger 2 plays smoothly with high display settings.
Display is good
Screen size is huge and HD display is quite good.
Display  very sharp you never expect is kind display in this price range  
The display is superb.
3. display is very good 
Good Battery back  smooth functioning  great display  sound 
Display   This one had the best display that I have seen.
Good display 
The full HD display is bright and touchscreen sensitivity is amongst the best we have seen.
Also the display is full HD and it displays contents excellently.
403PPI display is just awesome.
full hd display is good.
--------------------------------------------------------
heating issue  -57
Horrible Camera specially front and slight heating issues as well   rest all seems fine since i have not used it much.
I have not tried to find out hwy it happens but ask other friends who own this first if they have faced similar issues.
38 Degrees and not at all satisfied with heating problem and charging also if i am using any applications while charging the phone the phone is not at all charging up untill unless i stop using my device.
 Too much heating problem on average use.
You cant hold the phone for talking as well due to this heating issue.
I am facing full of heating issue from the mobile and rear cam is not good and battery is not stable.
Heating issue during charging is acceptable due to metallic body but not all time.
Good phone a little bit heating issues other wise it s good finger print sensor works good 
There is a minor heating issue while playing games for more than 30 mins  which I did only for testing purposes.
Super mobile  trust and bye it only heating problem is there but not that much  
Rather camera  battery and heating are not so major issues.
Other than that  I have no issues.
It is very usable and for me heating is not an issue.
if Letv wants eat hen  let them its one time  but if they are serious they will do something for it  lets wait if 21st feb gets you an update on EUI  and it resolves mainly heating camera and other issues.
Rember even Xiaomi faced same issues and now all is well in Xiaomi.
There are many minor issues which should be fixed.
My final say is  heating is not much of an issue at all.
I ll only be reviewing common known issues and confusions regarding this phone.
However  the heating problem was not much of a concern once I started charging regularly.
good phone for 11999  no major problem  slight heating issues are there but not that much  rear camera is good after update  but still the front camera is pathetic.
But it has little heating problem.
little heating issue but no prblm with it.
there are some minor issues but I hope they would resolved with the coming updates 
battery life is not so good heating issues
Heating issue  A lot of reviews spoke about this  but I didn t find a significant issue.
In short  at this price   this a great buy   some minor issues   but then u can have everything in 11k.
I am facing a lot of heating issues am completely unable to use my phone.
Mobile is getting too much heating during battery charging  Recommend to not use when it is got heat.
too much heating is main issue apart frtom that not a bad phone.
1s phone has very good quality  initially it had heating issue but the same is now reduced with update 
No abnormal Heating Issues found.
13  I have not found any heating issue  don t know why some users are blaming about heating issue.
2ghz octacore is very fast no other issues this is the rearlly super phone 
 Purchased many Phones from Flipkart but this the last one  Flipkart replaced the phone as it had severe heating and battery problems but the replaced phones has almost the same issues.
On the other side it WS vry gud camera or the colour size everything WS awesome but too much heating .
There are some minor issues like fast battery discharing  call quality  avg camera and heating issues while playing games  sometimes during phone calls and charing as well .
This phone I have been using for the past couple of months and have not faced much heating issues at all.
Iron Box Too much heating.
heats uo a little but again ignorable.
Minor issues with Software.
 Too much heating  
3 because of metal body there is little bit worm but not heating issue.
Though it is having 1 or 2 minor issues  but its far better than its Chinese varient which is having a lot of bloat wares.
Heating issue is very annoying.
Here are some UNIQUE ISSUES  Not available in the reviews that I read  that I have faced in terms of software   
All in all a happy customer and no real issues.
1  disappointed with the heating issue  phone heats like hell and its hardly impossible to grab this phone after 30 mins of usage and because of this issue i can t even take calls.
 except heating issue  which has become common with almost all mobiles in this price range  everything seems fine.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad quality  -20
So  I am truly disappointed by the build quality as it costed my more money which makes me think  I could have gone for samsung  lenovo or other known good brands.
It s build quality  snappy processor  display  finger print sensor  IR blaster  3GB RAM  Ample Storage and Fast charging are its strong points which are difficult to ignore.
However  it has plenty of issues  like a kernel that ends up eating into the battery life  camera and call quality issues.
The call quility  the phone produces clear sound on Letv speaker and headset  but on the other side of the reciever the call quality is pathetic.
4  call quality excellent.
LeEco certainly handpicked the best hardware bits for its smartphone  but fell flat when it came to the basics  which are the very areas  budget smartphone buyers are picky about  battery life and call quality .
Call Quality is too good and loud although the speaker phone.
Call quality is average .
Also by display digitizer was broken  build quality is very bad.
What will you do of features when the build in quality is cheaper than the pure chinese phone.
5 10 Call quality is very bad when we use the phone s ear piece.
Call quality very clear.
However  it has plenty of niggling issues  like a problematic kernel that ends up eating into the smartphones battery life and call quality issues that simply kill the EUI software experience that seems to be well thought of.
A very good build quality and a great display not excellent but will satisfy you if you want to watch movies or play games which have display quality of HD1080p  
screen quality look stuning games playing smooth no hang or lagg at all camera average hope future updates may solve the issue and build quality extra ordinery in this price range.
There are some minor issues like fast battery discharing  call quality  avg camera and heating issues while playing games  sometimes during phone calls and charing as well .
The build quality is top.
Just to mention   previously heard about call quality like it is poor however it s decent.
Call quality good.good quality  50
10 10 Excellent build quality.
  Its a fantastic phone under 11K build quality is amazing.
Wonderful build quality but it has a lot of heating problem even in normal use and showing only 1.
Call quality is subpar at best.
Good build quality.
Good build
Excellent Build   processor and memory as well as excellent display etc.
Long story short  it has the best build quality ever for a Rs 11 000 phone and it is so good  that it beats many so.
 Great build  smooth UI  very good screen quality   camera quality in outdor good   camera quality in indoor ok ok for rear camera   poor for front camera.
Call quality is decent.
Updated  Even i have come down that review  now i have tried making call  the quality was better than my earlier mobile.
Build  The build quality is very nice.
Great looking phone and excellent build quality in this price range.
Good build quality fitting is average  can see some tiny gaps in the corners.
Beat phone and good build   great camera good amazing processor 
Being made of unibody metal  it has great build quality and feels premium in every possible way.
Initially the phone looked very promising with brilliant build quality and good specs.
Very good build quality.
Phone Build is very good 9 10
Build quality is very good
Solid build quality.
Excellent build quality
Its the best looking mobile with good build quality.
Build quality is very good with a crystal clear picture clarity.
My expectation with this phone was to have good call quality  performance while browsing  dispaly and decent camera.
Sound quality is excellent while playing few audio and video clips  audio on phone call is okay but could be better.
1  Premium metal build which is among the best I have seen or used.
Bulid  Phone build is nice.
Mobile look and build is awesome.
Build Quality is premium.
The Build quality is awesome.
GOOD BUILD QUALITY 
 I like everything about this phone from looks to build quality  touch  fast charging etc.
The Good  1st of all the build quality of this one is spectacular.
a  Awesome build quality  very premium.
I am completely happy with the build quality and all other features but when comparing the photos taken with my friends Lenovo A 7000 the photo clarity it is very much poor.
But overall call quality is definitely not bad.
Excellent Build quality.
The build quality is solid and sturdy.
call quality is good 
The call quality is too poor that at full volume you ll hear cracking voice which is unexpected.
 Build quality is excellent 
Call quality could have been better 
--------------------------------------------------------
heating issue  -57
1  disappointed with the heating issue  phone heats like hell and its hardly impossible to grab this phone after 30 mins of usage and because of this issue i can t even take calls.
Horrible Camera specially front and slight heating issues as well   rest all seems fine since i have not used it much.
I have not tried to find out hwy it happens but ask other friends who own this first if they have faced similar issues.
38 Degrees and not at all satisfied with heating problem and charging also if i am using any applications while charging the phone the phone is not at all charging up untill unless i stop using my device.
 Too much heating problem on average use.
You cant hold the phone for talking as well due to this heating issue.
I am facing full of heating issue from the mobile and rear cam is not good and battery is not stable.
Heating issue during charging is acceptable due to metallic body but not all time.
I am facing a lot of heating issues am completely unable to use my phone.
There is a minor heating issue while playing games for more than 30 mins  which I did only for testing purposes.
Super mobile  trust and bye it only heating problem is there but not that much  
Rather camera  battery and heating are not so major issues.
It is very usable and for me heating is not an issue.
if Letv wants eat hen  let them its one time  but if they are serious they will do something for it  lets wait if 21st feb gets you an update on EUI  and it resolves mainly heating camera and other issues.
Rember even Xiaomi faced same issues and now all is well in Xiaomi.
There are many minor issues which should be fixed.
My final say is  heating is not much of an issue at all.
I ll only be reviewing common known issues and confusions regarding this phone.
good phone for 11999  no major problem  slight heating issues are there but not that much  rear camera is good after update  but still the front camera is pathetic.
But it has little heating problem.
little heating issue but no prblm with it.
There are some minor issues like fast battery discharing  call quality  avg camera and heating issues while playing games  sometimes during phone calls and charing as well .
Heating issue  A lot of reviews spoke about this  but I didn t find a significant issue.
In short  at this price   this a great buy   some minor issues   but then u can have everything in 11k.
Good phone a little bit heating issues other wise it s good finger print sensor works good 
Mobile is getting too much heating during battery charging  Recommend to not use when it is got heat.
too much heating is main issue apart frtom that not a bad phone.
1s phone has very good quality  initially it had heating issue but the same is now reduced with update 
No abnormal Heating Issues found.
13  I have not found any heating issue  don t know why some users are blaming about heating issue.
2ghz octacore is very fast no other issues this is the rearlly super phone 
 Too much heating  
 Purchased many Phones from Flipkart but this the last one  Flipkart replaced the phone as it had severe heating and battery problems but the replaced phones has almost the same issues.
On the other side it WS vry gud camera or the colour size everything WS awesome but too much heating .
This phone I have been using for the past couple of months and have not faced much heating issues at all.
there are some minor issues but I hope they would resolved with the coming updates 
heats uo a little but again ignorable.
Minor issues with Software.
Other than that  I have no issues.
3 because of metal body there is little bit worm but not heating issue.
Though it is having 1 or 2 minor issues  but its far better than its Chinese varient which is having a lot of bloat wares.
However  the heating problem was not much of a concern once I started charging regularly.
Here are some UNIQUE ISSUES  Not available in the reviews that I read  that I have faced in terms of software   
All in all a happy customer and no real issues.
battery life is not so good heating issues
Iron Box Too much heating.
 except heating issue  which has become common with almost all mobiles in this price range  everything seems fine.
Heating issue is very annoying.no heating  47
I knew about the heating issue and it is almost tolerable  but I cant go the entire day on a single charge.
Too much heating .
Too much heating as its a metal body 
The OS optimization in the future may also address the heating issue.
Major problem is heating issue
 Phone is good and value for money  but the major problem is heating.
10 day usage I found more heating problem like while charging and also if you are playing some heavy games.
Battery Backup is decent you ll get around 1 day of backup time with normal use   fast charging is working fine no issues with it
but some hanging problem and heating problem is there  camere is really awesome.
No major heating issue after the latest update.
I never face any such over heating issue except charging time.
Of course  Letv going to release a patch for it  So no more heating issue .
16k mobile  30k mobile  50k mobile all are having issues.
I am previous Redmi user and You LeTv R D team guys please once use MI phone  you will come to know what exact issues and difference is there in UI.
Initially had heating issue  however with the update it was omitted.
little heating issue but no prblm with it.
So much of heating issues while charging also in use.
but  some users may have the heating issue while charging with fast charger and while playing a game.
mobile heats while using mobile data and while may be due to metal body after using a back cover i don t feel the heat in my hand now.
2. over heating issue.
Due to metal body   people who used plastic body phns till now may feel it has more heating issue   but it s normal.
Major problem with the phone are the heating issues which might be due to mediatech processor.
no heating issue.
guts who r favmcing issues with mobile just update it to latest version.
Heating Issues   Not faced any such issue 
4 Heating   battery issue not as severe as 
Heating is the major problem of this device  if you use this only 10.
Maximum issues are software issues only.
the handset is amazing  operates flawlessly  good battery life and no major heating problems so far.
it is worth buying the only problem in this phone is heating .
Major issue with this phone is heating very quickly in just 15 Mins  if browsing with 3G network  playing games and watching videos or talking  even you can t hold it in your hand.
Fast charging is ok but with heating issues.
In late evening I tried to download Antu 3D but had similar issues   was only getting a speed of around 60 kbps.
good working but heating problem due to full metal body  
If you are ready to compromise on these issues  go ahead and buy this phone.
just has got more heating problem.
slight heating issues
Heating issues are good this product.
Heating is major issue always it is heat .
No more heating issues when you used it.
This phone is truly a Superphone at this price section and after recent S W update there is no more heating issue with it.
there is a little warming not heating  problem and that is ok because it has 2.
As suggested in most reviews over heating is a known issue now.
 Not good battery back up worst  heating issues poor camera heavy weight 
--------------------------------------------------------
bad_sound  -9
open sound is crystal clear and superloud but in earphones it is Average and there is no equalizer for music player hope OTA would cover this.
Ringtone sound is sufficiently loud.
Sound quality is average not as much as expected   Even they mentioned Dolby digital 
The call quility  the phone produces clear sound on Letv speaker and headset  but on the other side of the reciever the call quality is pathetic.
Sound is excellent of the speaker and headphones Not comes with Headphones .
Sound  The sound is loud.
sound quality isnt very good .
Good sound output  speaker as well as headset  this phone have only one speaker in bottom but its produce very loud and clear sound quality.good sound  35
Sound quality is average not as much as expected   Even they mentioned Dolby digital 
3 awesome sound
Decent sound.
Sound is awesome 
Good sound output  speaker as well as headset  this phone have only one speaker in bottom but its produce very loud and clear sound quality.
Sound from external speaker is good quality
  Sound quality is good.
f  The sound quality is also very good.
3  Good Sound Quality
Has a good sound quality when listened over headphone.
Tenth  I like most  sound quality is excellent.
Such as Remote  Screen Mirroring  user friendly  Good Sound  Good Display Quality  Fast Functioning.
4  sound is good equalizers   i used MI earphones   dts sound quality 
Audio   Using JBL ear phones quality is pretty good with all the details in the sound is good to hear
Phone sound quality is also good   clear
Le 1S is a mobile with all good features like camera pixel  storage capacity and a sound quality is good.
Sound quality is excellent while playing few audio and video clips  audio on phone call is okay but could be better.
Sound is ok
Really like the display and sound quality is also nice.
8 10 Sound quality is very good.
sound is also good.
Sound Recording Quality is also good.
Sound  Mono Speaker  still the sound quality is good.
Audio quality is good  when a good set of earphones are used  I usually use a ipod to listen to my music but this phone does sound good and it has a far better sound output through the jack than the Oneplus One.
sound quality is OK OK. the only best part is the looks and the fingerprint sensor.
The sound quality is also great.
Sound Quality  I had to reduce the volume.
Good sound with perfect clarity 
Sound is good 
--------------------------------------------------------
worst mobile  -17
Friend please check your device carefully for this stuck or dead pixel issue in your phone.
I have never witnessed any electronic device heat up so much ever.
This is the best device in this price bracket  a tough competitor for lenovo k 4 note and redmi note 3.
 Nice mobile it s quite cheap and compatible device which is a great deal at this price .
I m happy and relaxed after replacing my defective device but after a week I found 4.
5 greenish or white stuck dead pixels again in this replaced device.
And one more important is my device back button not working and its very irritating to me for web browising.
if ur previous device is mi means u wil slightly disappoint like me.
4 Media device not able to detect video files  its detect images only to your LED TV 
0 compatible device will become slightly warm during charging from 0 to 70   perfectly normal 
i buy this device on 25 frb but i face hanging issue so i initiate return request i received the device on time After checking all the configuration by Flipkart Executive  and i m using this device from then now from last couple of days it s battery doesn t last long more than 1hr.
I am really unhappy to get this device on top of this flipkart support folks are saying that the device is absolutely fine after running the smart check on my phone also they are saying 45 Degrees is common heat generated by this device.
I have been using this device from past 7 days and its the beast at this price of 11k.
some reviewer have mentioned that heating problem is solved  so mentioned they returned when they found mobile is faulty so i was assured ok if product is faulty it get returned however to my surprise flipkart guys refused to accept the faulty mobile.
Superphone thats the nickname they gave to this phone and I agree with them not because they made a perfect device  which they didn t but for they made a device with a lot of room for improvement with the premium feel and heavily loaded features just at 10999 lower than its production cost .awesome mobile  28
Quality of the product is very good but I received used device which is returned to flipkart by some one who faced a lot issues with that but requested for replacement but flipkart fellows saying your replacement guarantee has over but I purchased on 4th March 2016.
Performance of the device is good but it lags when we switch application 
Spekaer volume is just O. K. Overall it is a excellent device in this price bracket.
This device comes with a high.
Noticable bezel not entirely bezel less Most of the internet reviews doesnt justify this phone as this device is much more appealing when you see it in real   
Some shots during day time indoors or outdoors come out to be fantastic and can be compared to a camera from a ios device.
good device to use.
This is a good device packed in a budget price which offers competive features to put some of its other rivals to shame.
 Using this beautiful device for a week now.
some reviewer have mentioned that heating problem is solved  so mentioned they returned when they found mobile is faulty so i was assured ok if product is faulty it get returned however to my surprise flipkart guys refused to accept the faulty mobile.
Expecting the device to be more polished with the upcoming OTA updates 
I returned this product due to heat issue.
I m happy and relaxed after replacing my defective device but after a week I found 4.
Amazing device by Letv.
 Nice mobile it s quite cheap and compatible device which is a great deal at this price .
go for this device they have made a great device in this price range.
Feels like a premium device
I dont know whether you have known this issue see now i am not worried about my product only i am worried about the whole 50 products  RETURNS  why its being refused to accept you are the one who mail them to the customer particularly with an address where customer has to ship now your warehouse is not accepting it what the hell wrong with you  
Even with the above issues i am very happy with the device.
The Le 1s will give you a brilliant looking device with a fantastic display  near perfect software experience with awesome performance.
It is a very good device and very slim
0 compatible device will become slightly warm during charging from 0 to 70   perfectly normal 
I am really happy to be using this excellent device.
I am really unhappy to get this device on top of this flipkart support folks are saying that the device is absolutely fine after running the smart check on my phone also they are saying 45 Degrees is common heat generated by this device.
--------------------------------------------------------
design  27
Sleek Design  so great looks.
perfect design
Good design
speed is good design  handling is good.
Average mobile great design build look.
super design.
This phone is cute in look  very good design and its body finishing.
People can buy this for just to show off as it has got nice design and bright display 
If you liked the design and you are an average user then just go ahead and buy the phone  do not listen to haters  
Good Design .
At the same time  it is hard to recommend anything apart from the LeEco Le 1s in its price range because you have smartphones with better 4000mAh battery life like the Huawei Honor Holly 2 Plus at Rs 8 999  but sports an average design  that sit below it  and the OnePlus X with a Qualcomm Snapdragon 801 chipset  thats not as powerful  that now weirdly sits higher above at Rs 16 999.
The left one is made for symmetrical design.
1  Elegant design and premier look.
It feels really premium to hold and has a stylish design .
so for this budget it is ok to buy this new design.
Design  outstanding simple  smart design.
On the topic of EUI  unlike most manufacturers  it is very simple clean design  with the app drawer being absent  and a tap on the app switcher key displaying the Control Center  which houses toggles for important functions and app shortcuts  along with brightness slider and the list of running apps  which are arranged horizontally.
Unique metal body design is ultimate.
The three back lite buttons in the bottom are with hidden design and completely invisible but come in contact only when the light up
 As every one say Design is good and attracts many.
8 Stylish design.
Mobile design is good   
It clearly is a major design fault and LeEco experts should get back to the drawing table.
Build and design is very nice.
Design is outstanding
My one star is for its beautiful external design  Functionally  this is a piece of garbage.
phone design is super
Unibody metal design very attractive 
Build and design is excellent.
More than half of the memory is occupied by the system and its inbuilt app  1 Star is just for look and its compact design otherwise just a toy heating machine  LE 1s customer support is a heck  They came with a bang and gone ash like a proverb the very soon love goes very soon.
Very nice design.
 Very good design phone with excellent battery.
--------------------------------------------------------
in flash sale  -27
I am holding one in my hand which I bought on 2nd of Feb during the 1st flash sale.
I m one of the lucky to get in flash sale on 2nd Feb  and ever expected delivery before 24hrs.
I got the silver version as the gold one was not available for the the 3rd flash sale.
make cooling pad for it put flash sale  
Dont rush for flash sale  I did mistake in buying this phone in first flash sale  .
I got lucky to get one in the 2nd flash sale.
 Lucky to get it in flash sale yesterday  today morning by 10 30 AM i received the super phone.
I was too excited like others for this phone  and got my hands on it in 2nd flash sale.
Except for front flash.
I bought this phone during first flash sale and Flipkart delivered it well within the time.
Able to get hold of this mobile in first flash sale after desperately waiting for this mobile for over a month.
I am going to buy another piece with 3rd flash sale .
Intensity of flash is poor
I got this phone on the 3rd flash sale after missing out on the first two.
This phone is not that great and camera quality is bad  in low light captured images are dark  insufficient flash for capturing images in low light.
Purchased the phone during first flash sale.
 I have purchased this phone on first flash sale.
I bought this on flash sale.
 After going through lot of reviews on Flipkart as well as on other websites I finally purchased Silver variant in third flash sale   received it on 19th Feb 2016.
I tried in 1st flash sale but i managed to add to cart.
I took many pics and all were better and good looking  well  i got nervous because there is one flash with camera 
Lets see how many old phones they sale in that flash sale on 12th.
I bought this mobile in the 2nd flash sale.
i purchased le 1s in first flash sale after 10 days of usage i have no interest use this kind of device.
 I bought the phone during the 2nd flash sale.
Frent Camera flash is not available
I got this cell in second flash sale and get in hand on 13th Feb   my honest review after using it 5 days 
Camera quality is poor  and Flash is also to poor 
I was very excited for this phone  was able to buy in second flash sale
I received this phone on second flash sale.
I was so excited that i could book the phone in the flash sale and even more excited till the phone arrived.
Camera is descent but i tried it only indoor without flash but not disappointing
I bought this phone on 9 Feb the second flash sale and since then I possibly did everything to this phone other than rooting it which includes heavy gaming multitasking network tests benchmark tests camera test and even dropped it once from about 2 feet without case cover  the last one was a accident .
so i got it from 1st flash sale and after using it im very satisfied from this mobile at this price range.
I think the reason why all pieces did not sell during the flash sale is due to the battery issue.
So give it a chance  and buy in the next flash sale.
I am one of the lucky ones to get this phone on 2nd flash sale.
after my failured first attempt bought it on my second attempt in flash sale.
I have purchased the phone on flash sale in Feb.
i was able to add the product during the flash sale at 12 00 pm On 2nd Feb.
Nice phone go for it  all my friends also buying in next flash relese.
I have booked successfully LE 1S in first flash sell and I got it as soon as possible 
Flash was as good as dual tone in my J7
 I have bought this phone on second flash sale  I think its february.
I bought this phone in the first flash sale and Flipkart has delivered the phone next day  thanks to Flipkart.
Damn i have to make my sister missed the class and wait for the product delivery  cause if she missed again it will be returned to the seller and i have to wait for the next flash sale.
flash is dim and yellowish
 I have purchased this phone with excitement in second flash sale.
I bought this phone on 1st flash sale.
--------------------------------------------------------
good charging  26
The mobile gets hot during charging because it supports fast charging.
38 Degrees and not at all satisfied with heating problem and charging also if i am using any applications while charging the phone the phone is not at all charging up untill unless i stop using my device.
With C. type charger fast charging is commendable
and coming to the battery  battery life is not enough for me  as i am a heavy user  but fast charging makes it enough  its charging speed is superb  within 1 hour i get full battery i. e. 99  
and also most important  no heating flaws  even while charging and playing games like
Battery 3000mah battery might not be as mighty as you think I can get almost a day on light to medium usage but the company claims they will fix the battery problems with an ota update scheduled for 21st and also the fast charging helps here to compensate for the avg battery life.
Fast charging is great 
looking mirror finish  an IR blaster for remote control capabilities  and USB C with fast charging which works absolutely great.
backup is normal but fast charging makes it worthy.
Phone gets warm only while charging but after 90  of charging phone starts to get cooldown well thats how fast charging works  while doing day to day task phone never gets hot only slightly while gaming.
fast charging is a plus 
 I found it the next alternative best to redmi note 3 and lenovo k4 note  in terms of design and all departments but lacks that importance for camera where it needs a drastic improvement almost in every aspect of camera details  heating was nominal but worse while charging 
Fast Charging is good but 1st day when i charged it took less than 1 hour to charge from 15  to 100    2nd time when i charged from 0   to 100  it took 1 1 2 hrs 
A great camera that supports 4K video recording  a super fast fingerprint sensor and great battery life with fast charging support  fast charger included .
Charging is quick but I realized that it drains also super fast.
I dont see any fast charging happening.
3. type C charging is super fast
Fast charging is ok but with heating issues.
Fast charging is good 
Fast charging is good.
Quite fast charging is awesome.
Fast charging is applicable only when you charge with provided adapter.
Fast charging is superb.
Fast charging is awesome.
--------------------------------------------------------
to metal body  24
12 mins  i felt heat increasing but again in my personal opinion   this may be normal with full metal body design.
And finally if u fit in an octa core processor in a sleek metal body  the temp is bound to increase  but it s nt like it will burn ur hands or something.
The phone claims to have been built with   metal body   but is extremely fragile.
Attractive looks with unibody premium metal design
Good metal body n good display 
Excellent Metal body.
Heating issue during charging is acceptable due to metallic body but not all time.
I can only imagine 2A current flowing in 3A battery  It s suppose to heat  and with metal  obviously more heat conductive  back cover  it s expected that user feels this heat.
The metal body is awesome.
full metal body.
I don t know about the quality of the metal but it looks sturdy enough.
The body is sturdy and very similar to 6S plus in design.
Looks fantastic with full metal body.
Sleek metal body finish and ligh weight
 great mobile day by day use performance going to peak level display sound battery back up  everything great and i cant get any heating issue still now some time it will show because its full metal body buy it 
Now for Heating  Yes its heated more than other phones and I think its have very powerful processor and sleek metal body so heats direct effect to metal body and metal is a very good conductor of heat.
Full body is chrome plated. 
But it becomes hot during charging due to metal body.
full metal for 10 k is really nice 
Due to metal body   people who used plastic body phns till now may feel it has more heating issue   but it s normal.
full metal.
The metal looks beautiful and rich  but that obviously leads to a slippery grip of the phone which should not be a concern if you are going for a metal body phone.
6 GB   3 phone is hanging  4 display resolution is like karbon   so many thing and place it will write chines type   body is weak and how they make full they compair this brand with Samsung s7eage first bit how floted this type of news in what s apps and other promoting this phone by filpkart I think they are checking also now I understand filpkart also not bothered about phone qualify he only seeing his profit and making buyr full through promoting its a big example of current add on TV of filpkart 
1 Heating issue if you are usage is heavy  Metal body may be the reason for heating issue.
Since  it has a metal body  it tends to get heated up quite too much than one can anticipate but this was only when I first charged the mobile on receiving it.
the phone do heats up  but not so high as said by many users  while charging i didn t see a huge difference between the phones temperature yes if you use your phone while charging  it will obviously heat up  any phone will heat up if you do that  buts its okay  its not a big issue in this full metal unibody phone  camera was average when i brought it  but after the update  i got a very good camera  its not so bad  its pretty good for selfies and outdoor shooting  also lowlight is average 
It is little heating up initially may be because of metal body i guess overall worth for money just go for it  let me try to use it for one week and write detailed review.
First i charged the phone to 100  and it was normal heat  that too because of metal compact body.
Reception is slightly weak due to metal body  I don t know if that s problem of model or particular piece.
Due to metal body the edges of phone is very sharp that may hurt you while playing games
it has an awesome metal body and has a good feel in had.
Xiaomi has poor body while LeEco has shing metal body plus wonderful display.
good working but heating problem due to full metal body  
Great finger sensor and good metal body finish.
2 GHz processor which in itself is very powerful  moreover  the phone is sleek and is made up of full metal uni.
2 Signal reception is very poor  shows full signal if some body calls u you will be not reachable.
Overall the specs are a killer atvthevpeice point  and I wish the makers had not gone that extra mile  to use a complete metal casing.
1  Built quality is really great and it has premium look  finishing of body is simply superb.
mettalic body is good but its border is very sharp so it can harm to cut in hand and bleeding.
Stylish metal body  slim and good to handle.
heating not much metal body so you will feel a lil bit but its okk processor is heavy and metal body you will definately have some   go with back cover  
hi   the product is worth for money  it is beautiful in color and metal body is good  but no ear phones with phone  if they give ear phone it is good.
and the full metal body gives it a gkow.
Its too fragile  even with its metallic body   if it accidently fell down then ur 11K rupees are gone waste.
Look and Feel  The look and feel is very attractive with a stylish body Rating   5 5 
mobile looks very attractive with its full metal uni.
 Nice camera  good picture quality  good speed  sturdy n sleek metallic body overall good phone 
Its complete metal and looks stylish and fits my hand perfectly.
--------------------------------------------------------
looks  22
Sleek Design  so great looks.
phone performance and also looks are really good and also very smooth working.
Looks really well crafted and very snappy.
Looks very good 
If you judge only by the looks and finish  it is passable even in the 30 thousand plus category.
If you read this review and still you want to buy then after receiving mobile check all above cons with it on first day only dont go on premium looks.
Attractive looks with unibody premium metal design
The Camera is good  Fingerprint scanner works efficiently  and the phone has amazing looks.
Build quality of this phone is simply the best and silver looks amazing
phone looks good 
Looks are premium and stylish .
Looks fantastic with full metal body.
1. looks are very premium and official.
looks like some older cheap chinese brands May be this also come from the same  .
 It s a awesome mobile looks good but has heating problem.
Excellent looks.
I was looking for a decent mobile with good looks on flipkart for very long.
The device looks are awesome as per the price.
looks are excellent.
LeEco Le 1S Mobile looks grand look.
Looks very similar to Redmi note 3.
7. looks is good.
 All seams to be good in specs but its just an average budget phone with better looks  thats all.
Not a great buy but an average budget phone with better looks  thats all.
Looks good and premium.
Performance and looks are excellent.
 The product got awesome looks and features  also impressed with the touch response and fingerprint sensor which is super sensitive.
Back Look is excellent although i have white one but back is silver which is awesome although front looks ok ok 
5  better built quality than Redmi note 3 and premium looks.
 A good phone in this price segment with awesome outstanding looks.
--------------------------------------------------------
fingerprint sensor  22
fingerprint sensor is just fine.
Design and fingerprint sensor are good  but battery is under performing.
IR blaster and fingerprint good 9 10
 Awesome design  super flexible  sexy fingerprint sensor  smooth touch interface  it would surely be a threat to XIAOMI and IPHONE.
The Camera is good  Fingerprint scanner works efficiently  and the phone has amazing looks.
Fingerprint sensor is good and responsive.
Fingerprint works good.
Good fingerprint scanner.
5 fingerprint sensor works too fast
Fingerprint is excellent 
Fingerprint sensor is nice.
Fingerprint sensor is outstanding.
front camera is too bad  fingerprint scanner is not working properly    most important Filpkart will not refund you.
fingerprint sensor is good not excellent.
The phone has a fast and an accurate fingerprint sensor.
4 Fingerprint sensor is quite fast and accurate 9 out of 10 times success .
Fingerprint is awesome 
Fingerprint sensor is too fast.
Good working fingerprint scanner
fast and accurate fingerprint reader.
4 Fingerprint sensor is accurate and ensures complete security.
Fingerprint sensor works perfect.
4 Fingerprint sensor is amazing.
b  Fingerprint Sensor is very good.
 The product got awesome looks and features  also impressed with the touch response and fingerprint sensor which is super sensitive.
 very poor in built quality very bad fingerprint scannersc it takes a lot of time to iunlock so do t by this product for built quality if no u can go for this product 
  For a budget phone  it is packed to the gills  with 13MP back and 5MP front cameras  a fingerprint sensor  with a nice.
Decent fingerprint sensor  this phone have fast fingerprint sensor.
 this is not a phone its completely a phone which works with more powerful fingerprint   it has a good battery backup   and a POWERFUL XELIO X 10 PROCESSOR   3GB OF RAM WITH 32 GB ROM 
Fingerprint is fast n responsive.
4  Excellent Fingerprint scanner  I simply love this feature.
Fingerprint sensor working great it does unlock phone very quickly.
--------------------------------------------------------
worst charger  -21
but fast charging is nt sole feature of a smartphone.
and coming to the battery  battery life is not enough for me  as i am a heavy user  but fast charging makes it enough  its charging speed is superb  within 1 hour i get full battery i. e. 99  
38 Degrees and not at all satisfied with heating problem and charging also if i am using any applications while charging the phone the phone is not at all charging up untill unless i stop using my device.
 Awesome phone in this price range good battery back up finger print working fine and fast charging is very useful over all good phone 
The fast charging feature helps and I was able to charge my phone from 20  to 55  with half an hour charging.
Superb look  battery is average but fast charging is very well work finger print sensor 9 out of 10 times working  no any hanging problem smoothly run some time little heating problem those are normal in metlic body 
5 star for fast charging.
7. fast charging is working very well even the phone is on.
Yes  it sometimes rises quite alot but this is a give and take we have with fast charging.
Fast charging is not consistent.
backup is normal but fast charging makes it worthy.
but fast charging is there so v can satisfy with it while charging i experienced warm on sides.
its buttery smooth in daily performance with its killer looks  yes the only con is bit low battery backup but thankfulky it comes with fast charging .
Other major claim that falls flat on the face  is the fast charging and battery claims.
for the name sake its fast charging.
 It s the best phone in this range and fast charging is the advantage n can compare with high end mobiles.
However  It does heat while charging because it is fast charging and even Nexus 6P heats up while charging.
2hours screen on time on very high usages well who bothers when u have really fast fast charging 
Battery drainage is quite high as expected  but fast charging is an advantage.
 mobile is good and fast charging  but it battery draing fast when browing and using 3g network  camera also superb and full hd and additional option is finger print pad for good security 
The fast charging is really fast and just superb.
--------------------------------------------------------
high end  21
No lags when playing high end games like nfs mw real racing 3 asphalt 8 gta.
 Good product in best price with high end features.
I have been using high end Smartphones for over a decade now.
le giving so many features in high end phones for just 10999 .
As this phone comes with high end Hardware  Light heat should come.
It is a good budget phone with high end configuration.
As high end display of Letv  It shows picture as low level  But when you see the same image on another mobile.
Luckily my handset has no issues at all of heating   I played all high end games since yesterday.
With little heating which is normal in such high end games.
10 10  All high end games like Asphalt 8  dead trigger 2 plays smoothly with high display settings.
You will definitely feel that you are using high end premium phone.
we can see only in High end devices.
 It s the best phone in this range and fast charging is the advantage n can compare with high end mobiles.
3  Display  The 403 ppi display with a high end full HD display giving more clear images
2 no lag even on high end game
While gaming  temperature reaches mid fifties  causing frame drops and lags  even with basic games like subway surfer  world cricket championship  yet to test with high end games
if want those cons so go to purchase high end phones 
all the features are comparable to any high end android .
Even the high end phones and cameras will struggle in low light.
Premium specs which even an high end phone does not possess
It has a high end processor and this is a metal body.
Camera is good but unlike any high end phones.
It has all the features that you look jnto a high end phone.
Can easily play high end games also.
i am saying not only with high end phone   compare to low end phones its display showing dark 
1  High End Design .
--------------------------------------------------------
a metal body  13
12 mins  i felt heat increasing but again in my personal opinion   this may be normal with full metal body design.
And finally if u fit in an octa core processor in a sleek metal body  the temp is bound to increase  but it s nt like it will burn ur hands or something.
The phone claims to have been built with   metal body   but is extremely fragile.
it has an awesome metal body and has a good feel in had.
Good metal body n good display 
Excellent Metal body.
Heating issue during charging is acceptable due to metallic body but not all time.
The metal body is awesome.
full metal body.
Looks fantastic with full metal body.
Sleek metal body finish and ligh weight
 great mobile day by day use performance going to peak level display sound battery back up  everything great and i cant get any heating issue still now some time it will show because its full metal body buy it 
Now for Heating  Yes its heated more than other phones and I think its have very powerful processor and sleek metal body so heats direct effect to metal body and metal is a very good conductor of heat.
But it becomes hot during charging due to metal body.
Due to metal body   people who used plastic body phns till now may feel it has more heating issue   but it s normal.
The metal looks beautiful and rich  but that obviously leads to a slippery grip of the phone which should not be a concern if you are going for a metal body phone.
1 Heating issue if you are usage is heavy  Metal body may be the reason for heating issue.
Since  it has a metal body  it tends to get heated up quite too much than one can anticipate but this was only when I first charged the mobile on receiving it.
It is little heating up initially may be because of metal body i guess overall worth for money just go for it  let me try to use it for one week and write detailed review.
First i charged the phone to 100  and it was normal heat  that too because of metal compact body.
Reception is slightly weak due to metal body  I don t know if that s problem of model or particular piece.
Attractive looks with unibody premium metal design
Xiaomi has poor body while LeEco has shing metal body plus wonderful display.
good working but heating problem due to full metal body  
Great finger sensor and good metal body finish.
the phone do heats up  but not so high as said by many users  while charging i didn t see a huge difference between the phones temperature yes if you use your phone while charging  it will obviously heat up  any phone will heat up if you do that  buts its okay  its not a big issue in this full metal unibody phone  camera was average when i brought it  but after the update  i got a very good camera  its not so bad  its pretty good for selfies and outdoor shooting  also lowlight is average 
Due to metal body the edges of phone is very sharp that may hurt you while playing games
Stylish metal body  slim and good to handle.
heating not much metal body so you will feel a lil bit but its okk processor is heavy and metal body you will definately have some   go with back cover  
hi   the product is worth for money  it is beautiful in color and metal body is good  but no ear phones with phone  if they give ear phone it is good.
and the full metal body gives it a gkow.
Its too fragile  even with its metallic body   if it accidently fell down then ur 11K rupees are gone waste.
 Nice camera  good picture quality  good speed  sturdy n sleek metallic body overall good phone 
--------------------------------------------------------
memory  12
I did not encounter any lag  frame drops even when playing memory intensive games.
amazing memory and speed.
Best option in today time can beat to the best the ram is good the memory is also good 
Usable 25 GB memory might prove little too less for some users 
Dosent hang  is fast enough  the 28GB internal memory is a boon.
Free memory is less than 700Mb after a few apps opened.
No more troubles of shifting your data feom internal to external memory.
3gb ram  32 memory  fingerprint scanner.
if you want a good camera phone and expandable memory .
Sufficient memory space  32 GB .
It gives only 1 GB or less memory out of 3 GB
High clocking speed  large usable memory makes running games such as Asphalt 8  Airborne a piece of cake
Expandable memory
32 GB of internal memory but we get 25 GB
2 GHz xelio x10 Octo core processor  3gb Ram 32gb internal memory  Full HD display  Dolby Speaker n a lot more in 10k  That s mind blowing.
3  No expandable memory option 
 Good phone in looks  but i observed it is too slow and only one GB memory is available.
installed bloatware apps and extremely efficient memory management.
The free memory varies between 1 GB and 1.
I had opened all the apps one by one and checked memory  it went minimum 532 but no lagging  then I tried subway surfer  yes game lagged  or bit jerky not much  I downloaded around 10 other apps  and then cleaned the memory  got 1.
Inbuilt memory of 25gb is available and which is more than enough even if there s no expandable memory.
They didnt even provide external memory card slot.
2 GB available free memory which is too low.
No external memory support
6 GB available free memory which is too low.
Got 23 GB of memory available for use   Seems EUI takes much space 
No Expandable memory
External memory card option should be there.
Yes it is true you cannot extend the memory  you must confine yourself to the limited inbuilt storage.
No External SD Card slot but it has 32 GB of internal memory out of which you ll get around 29.
For this price 10999 is a very good purchase but there is only problem which is it does not have an external memory card slot.
 ram automatically get full  i get installed only few aaps not well  internal memory and ram problem only other features are good and productive.
 Waste phone always get heated up low memory no refund or replacement 
Memory  I forgot to check available memory because of joy   
--------------------------------------------------------
ota update  -12
It has a heating problem but their new update has almost fixed it.
Hats off to LeEco team for building an excellent product at such a low cost  it certainly stands out  clear display  finger print   camera has improved a lot and heating reduced after the latest update on 25th.
Heating was a problem  but after the stable update in February  it has been decreased a lot  
And maybe no Android N update in future .
problem solved in latest OTA update 
Hope these will be fixed in next update.
No major heating issue after the latest update.
it is average not as bad as some people reviewing here it would be improved through next OTA update
Moreover  battery life would also be optimized with the new OTA update.
i think letv will improve that also in their next update  as they have released the developer version of Marshmallow  we will get it very soon.
An ota update will be hitting on 21feb so stay tuned.
And also it will surely improve with scheduled OTA updates by the company  
7 Heating issue is resolved after the last OTA update  at least for me .
I feel this is a software issue as I have seen this after I have installed the latest update.
I Reset phone for problems mentioned in first update.
5 months and its great to use never found any LAg and after the new update everything is more fluid  the OS is also smooth.
 very good phone under 11k waiting for marshmallow update.
With new OTA update  28th march 2016  camera performance also increased .
Got software update last week and that made UI a bit more attractive.
Waiting for marshmallow update.
today we got a new OTA update  looks like they are improving camera  messaging and others  please go through the release comments of the OTA update  looks like they are working to fix the issues.
and I am sure LETV will fix this problem in next OTA update.
NEW  UPDATE.
Initially it heated even for 3 to 4 minutes usage but after software update it is not heating that much but still getting heated when we play games on it for more than 15 minutes.
10  Feedback  U can give feedback of any type of problem so that they can fix it in next update.
5 Marshmallow update is not likely.
Camera quality also very good after the recent update.
nd next update will also be given by company which may helps.
--------------------------------------------------------
octa core processor  11
While playing games or in regular use it just gets warm which is quite normal due to octa core processor.
Snappy processor  2.
Now for Heating  Yes its heated more than other phones and I think its have very powerful processor and sleek metal body so heats direct effect to metal body and metal is a very good conductor of heat.
Great processor  Helio X10 is very fast and powerful processor.
fast performance with ultimate processor.
12 apps open  1GB ram is left and the fast processor makes switching between apps quite a smooth task.
2 GHz Helio X10 turbo MTK 6795T octa core processor running so smooth.
Know it s one of the most powerful mobile processor so without a doubt it will heat.
High processor.
I bought this phone only for helio x10  but what s purpose of having a powerful processor with poor ram managing  battery eating software 
2 Ghz which is one of the best processor at this point of time.
Major problem with the phone are the heating issues which might be due to mediatech processor.
Awesome phone specially for those having low budget with extra smart features like 3gb ram  full metal body and nice processor .
2 processor the mobile basically gives out heat 
camera good processor excellent 2.
The processor is really fast.
I booked on 9th feb and got that 11th feb in sale  I am really happy to got this as its super phone  Yes I do agree the heathing issue  still you are getting fantastic processor   Ram   Display size   Premium look  Finger print sensor.
The only reason I didn t go for Lenovo K4 Note is because of it s weak processor.
Processor works pretty fast  sometimes I see a lag in the botton front panel buttons.
5 inch Screen  IR Blaster  and a decent processor.
heating not much metal body so you will feel a lil bit but its okk processor is heavy and metal body you will definately have some   go with back cover  
Snappy Processor
--------------------------------------------------------
value for money  10
Overall  my impression with this phone is this is a great value for money.
Overall value for Money.
Overall phone is good value for money 
Le 1S is a wonderful phone and at the price of Rs 10999  it is great value for money.
true value for money.
Best value for money.
This is best value for money one can get at this price point.
Overall Value for money mobile when compared to other brands which are expensive     
Good value for money.
At present Its the best value for money device in the market.
 Good Value for money.
The overall feedback on the Rs 11 000 phone has been as expected  It offers superb value for money and can give competion to any model priced less than Rs 20 000 in India.
True value for money.
As for the mobile  its steal deal and great value for money.
--------------------------------------------------------
best in class  9
 it best in class ever.
Best in class  AnTuTu benchmark results .
Best in class hardware.
 Exelent very good phone one of the best in its class worth 30000 features 
38  Best in Class  
Best in class build quality at this rate.
best in class design combined with best in class performance 
Fingur censor  The best in class.
best in its class.
--------------------------------------------------------
finger print scanner  9
finger print scanner is good.
Finger print scanner works perfect.
Great looking  fast fingerprint scanner  fast charging  responsive touch  Good colour reproduction.
Fingerprint scanner works good.
Fingerprint scanner is good.
The camera is below average when considered to the competion  Honor 5X and Lenovo K4 Note  there are couple of software issues waiting to be fixed  absence of Gyroscope might annoy and fingerprint scanner could have been more consistent.
Touch and Finger print scanner is perfectly good.
The fingerprint scanner is very very accurate .
The fingerprint scanner is actually fantastic and is fast but sometimes pretends to not recognise your touch.
Fingerprint scanner   Exceptionally good.
Finger Printer Scanner is good.
Fingerprint The scanner works awesome Rating   5 5 
Le 1s boasts the world s first mirror surfaced fingerprint scanner with 6H hardness
Very less phones have a fingerprint scanner in such a low range.
Fingerprint Scanner Is second good thing is in this phone.
Fingerprint scanner is prone to finger prints  finger print works in any direction we place the fingers i mean it works 360 degrees 
Fingerprint scanner is very good.
Finger print scanner works fine  this makes this device awesome.
Excellent Finger Print Scanner  Didn t work once but re.
 Fingerprint Scanner is the one of the fastest working Scanner i ever see.
Fingerprint scanner is excellent.
Fingerprint Scanner is great.
Finger touch scanner works great and easily placed.
--------------------------------------------------------
super fast  8
This is ridiculous coz considering that i havent used the phone at all in the night and once under 15  the battery discharges in super fast mode and you could literally see the percentage drop.
A great camera that supports 4K video recording  a super fast fingerprint sensor and great battery life with fast charging support  fast charger included .
Charging is quick but I realized that it drains also super fast.
3. type C charging is super fast
 Awesome design  super flexible  sexy fingerprint sensor  smooth touch interface  it would surely be a threat to XIAOMI and IPHONE.
Screen super rich n looks.
LeEco provides very good Super fast charger with this phone.
Very good  super fast working  high speed  picture quality is very nice good selfie mode 
go for one   x but if you are looking for a phone with super fast processer  then go with this.
Super slow video recording .
I have ordered this phone on 2nd Feb   flashsale and mobile is in my hands on 3rd Feb  thanks to Flipkart for super fast delivery.
--------------------------------------------------------
look and feel  8
Unibody metal Shell gives you a premium   solid feel like iphone.
Pros  As everyone knows look and feel is awesome.
A feel good on hand.
1 premium look and feel
Heating  feel warm always while using 3g and 4g 
Look n Feel no less than I phone.
Very premium feel
battery is good  look and feel awesome  camera both front and back are good in day light   at night average  performance is the excellent .
Our phones are also encaged in metallic cover or wrapped in metallic bands  resulting in a relatively warmer feel to the hand.
Just One star for premium look and feel.
Look and feel is awesome.
it has an awesome metal body and has a good feel in had.
Very premium feel.
i think it is only for winter season phone beacuse when you feel cold you put it in your hand and feel warm warm.
Look and Feel  The look and feel is very attractive with a stylish body Rating   5 5 
all premium feel
Superphone thats the nickname they gave to this phone and I agree with them not because they made a perfect device  which they didn t but for they made a device with a lot of room for improvement with the premium feel and heavily loaded features just at 10999 lower than its production cost .
One of my colegue purchased the LETV 1S mobile   at first sight feel of the mobile I also got impressed.
If you are moving IOS to this OS  the transition will be seamless since you will have the same look and feel 
--------------------------------------------------------
low light conditions  -8
Camera  Average camera It takes good pics in bright daylight but the images turnout grainy when shot in low light or artificial light.
Camera quality is also good but  not very good in low light conditions but still it is acceptable.
It struggles a bit in low light but still clicks decent photos.
The camera quality is very pathetic in low light conditions.
First Cons   Camera behaves like 5MP and Display in Bright Light not visible much.
Did not expect good result form this phone s camera in low light.
2. camera quality is not good in low light.
Camera in low light is not great.
The camera is not very good  the f number is not low  that means low light photos are blurry.
Only camera is little bad in low light .
Camera is good can be better especially under low light.
This phone is not that great and camera quality is bad  in low light captured images are dark  insufficient flash for capturing images in low light.
5 10  but good under outdoor good light conditions.
camera is not up to the mark it struggle in low light also the front camera is not so good but outdoors picture quality is good 
Dim light or low light but they didn t know the complete features of camera app.
Camera quality is very bad with artificial light  even you have good lighting in Indore .
Low light photos can be improved with little trick and setting but OS improvements are necessary.
Gets good amount of details even in low light.
below average in low light.
If you are a photography lover  than this is not for you  i mean in day light camera performance is above average and low light it is average i give 7 10.
but not in low light.
8. camera is descent in low light but in natural light is too good 
During night time pictures are not captured with good light  need to improve in FLASH of the mobile 
With sufficient light outside they both work fine but the moment we are indoor the output seems like that of a VGA camera.
Camera is good  Day light camera is awesome   dim light is ok ok   front is ok ok but day light photos are awesome also provides you blurred effect if you know how to focus things correctly
Ok in good light conditions  bad in low light conditions.
Currently images in low light are not images only its very bad.
Camera clarity is worst I have ever seen  I can t even think to open camera specially in low light.
The selfie camera is also good but low light pics aren t that great.
CAMERA  its camera is aswm in outdoor condition and it takes some decent pictures in also indoor condition but some tym it lags in low light which u can ignore but no phone in this range can give u 4k recording and slow motion recordings so camera is 7 10  
Camera  Main camera is very good in good light and in very low light camera is average.
Camera is not that great in low light.
It lags in low light photos poor ram management.
Works well in natural light.
But shoots good photos in natural light.
The camera struggles a bit in low light and artificial lighting conditions but it takes decent pictures in outdoor lighting conditions.
1 Camera quality of both rear and front is pathetic while indoor and under low light.
Even the high end phones and cameras will struggle in low light.
Camera  it s probably the weakest part of the camera in low light but strongest part in good lighting conditions.
Flash light is bit low as compared to My Asus zenfone5 
Better not to discuss about low light photo which is horrible  but  flash light  even though it is single  manged to get a better photo.
And the camera picture quality is worst in low light conditions  which makes you not to rely on this phone camera when you go out for a trip.
cam in low light is not good.
Front camera is below average in low light but pretty average in light conditions and rear one is above average and keep in mind that it can improve via OTA  so dont be too anxious about it as its the first time for company and still camera is good.
It s a blind eye buy if one is not interested shooting in low light and don t care about battery backup.
For selfies if there is good light available then it takes stupendous shots or else it s a real dud.
--------------------------------------------------------
days of usage  -8
2 Heating  you can use this to cook food as it gets extremely hot in extensive usage 
Most people with regular usage will find its performance in real life usage quite good.
The battery struggles to last for 1 day even with moderate usage with no gaming and browsing for 3 hours.
Good to use  only issue is battery drains within 4 hours of full usage.
warm during normal usage 
Many users are complaing about heating issues but I have seen only minimal heat in this device during heavy usage.
a bit of warmth is expected due to the heavy usage but that s evident with every other phone.
5  Ram usage should be future reduced.
4. no lags as for daily usage.
Polymer 3000 mah battery which is fast charged as the device has fast charging capability battery takes aroung 90 minutes to get charged and discharges pretty fast as well on high usage.
Only con I can think of is the battery which lasts just a day with medium to less heavy usage.
Coming to battery life  I was using Oneplus One till a few days ago and the phone was a good performer in everyday usage.
Heavy usage with mobile data on it will almost last a 10 hours not more.
good   easily lasts a day on moderate usage .
I crashed 3 phones due to heavy usage.
battery drains bit fast like continuous 3g usage it comes for 8 hours and if u watch videos continuously it comes for 5 hours.
4. some kind of vibration when phone is on charging mode and in hand  it is due to metal body  i think not suitable for usage while charging 
After 1 and half days of usage  below are my observations.
Heavy usage about 12 hrs  gameing movie watching 
Can hold fr a day with heavy usage .
Lasts a day with moderate usage.
So during normal usage it doesnt heats up much and is tolerable.
On heavy usage it did not go beyond 600MB free ram for me.
Heats up too much on charging and on continuous usage.
heavy usage  
However  I personally dint face any issue on proper usage of phone.
Not much usage on internet.
Actually I bought this phone because of this processor   3 GB ram its a great combination for heavy usage.
At the optimum usage   charging the phone  you can use it as heater to make hot water.
In high usage  it may last upto 1 day.
To my way of usage i start to believe that this mobile will last for 3days.
On controlled moderate usage  the charge lasts just 1 3rd of the day and one needs to carry the charger along.
My charge on the mobile would always be less than 50  even when usage is low.
Poor battery life  battery drain very fast even in low usage like whats app  calls etc.
Battery is not bad  Easily more than 14 hours for full usage such as 3G  Music or photograghy or gaming.
other wise the phone is very good for daily usage.
Excellent battery Life  every one says it has poor battery life idk why they say but when i received this fon i formatted this fon and now battery   can give you continuous usage of more than 5 hours although it also has batter resistant mode  
6 10  The battery drains fast  but will still last for a day with moderate usage even with 3G ON  
I understand that metal unibody designs normally generate heat but this phone seems to be heating up a lot just with basic usage like browsing  apps installations.
--------------------------------------------------------
a little bit  -8
Heating when phone charging nd sometime little bit heating but its okey.
But coming to the camera its very good in outdoor conditions and take good shots but it works a little bit down in dim light conditions.
Camera  The camera on this phone is very nice in daylight but suffers little bit in low light shootings.
Good phone a little bit heating issues other wise it s good finger print sensor works good 
Only One thing which I noticed is that its camera is good but as Letv makers have set very high bench mark  we have definitely expected high in this area also but here is only area were I was little bit get disappointed with both cameras specially front one.
If anybody is facing little bit heat then guys its normal.
Little bit heating issue is still there.
When I purchased this phone  it wasn t updated and that s why it heats little bit but after it s 1st update   my Le works perfect without heat and lag.
Battery sometimes heats a little bit.
HEATING  there is no heating problem as I heard before   it warm up little bit not very time may be because of metalic body 9 10 
Every phone heats little bit now that will be unfair u also need metal body and you don t want slightest heating.
only camera is little bit unsatisfying.
Lenovo K4 Note is for those who want better speakers but can skimp out on the performance  in the same price range  honor 5x is for those who want better battery life  a little bit better camera and can deal with a laggy interface  and as for me  personally  I can t deal with a phone which whimpers on its way to my facebook page.
The camera protrudes out a little bit.
A little bit heat is common in all devices of this type because of the metal body.
--------------------------------------------------------
gb of ram  7
another is its RAM space is less than other 3 GB phones.
3gb ram available and camera is like vga thinking to return soon 
3 gb of RAM free.
The phone comes with 3GB of RAM  dual.
5GB RAM is free  I am not sure what if we install more apps   Seems EUI consuming heavy RAM as well 
It has 3 GB RAM but I had never seen 1  GB RAM available.
Helio X10 and 3GB of ram is just perfect.
12 apps open  1GB ram is left and the fast processor makes switching between apps quite a smooth task.
RAm almost 1 gb free good enough for processing.
1 GB ram remains free most of the times when you don t have too many apps running.
1 GB RAM free.
same apps I installed on my previous mobile with 1 GB RAM and it always showed 300 MB free  I would say 6 GB required for this phone to manage the apps.
More than 1 GB RAM is generally free while 4.
Out of 3GB RAM we will get only 1 GB free  
5 GB of RAM is free for use at any point of time  this does not impair performance  and there is no lag at all  which has been a revelation for me as far as Android goes.
When ever i uses 2 or 3 small apps like whatsapp   fb   messenger   hike then it shows only 300 ram available of 3 gb.
Awesome phone specially for those having low budget with extra smart features like 3gb ram  full metal body and nice processor .
Poor RAM management  out of 3 GB ram we get only 1 GB ram for free.
2 GB  Approx  Ram free every time.
Out of 3GB  available ram 1.
3GB Ram  Free ram is quit low  
4 GB RAM free out of 3 GB.
3 GB Ram is very good for fast processing.
only 1 gb ram is available 
3 GB of RAM which is great for multitasking 
As usual 3gb Ram  Working fine without lag  Which was nice .
you will never get x. GB said ram free in your any device  it is the requirement to run your mobile basic software OS  standard apps  etc.
--------------------------------------------------------
people  7
 the heating issue has been fixed 80  so far  performance has been hugely improved   PEOPLE calm your tits Leco cares a lot about their customers and it shows.
To those other people who write tons of other stuff apart from the above mentioned problems there can only be two things either they are paid by other companies to destroy letv s market or they had a real bad luck to receive a faulty device.
it is average not as bad as some people reviewing here it would be improved through next OTA update
I saw that many rich people prefer Apple because of its premium look 
Immediately i intimated with flipkart people  They given replacement.
its been a week since i have been using this LEeco 1s and i need to to say that its an amazing phone under sub 15K segment the built and quality of the phone looks and feel premium people looking at the for the 1st would be confused to the iphone 6s as letv has used aeroplane aluminium grade material and also worlds 1st phone with screwless design
after that i received a mail in the mail it was mentioned that  we didnt have any pickup service in your location kindly ship with the third party couirer and the amount for the courier fees will be refund to your flipkart wallet  firstly people see i live in lucknow and its the damn capital city also a metro city not only this it is counted in the Top 10 cities in india how can it be possible that pick service of the flipkart is not available here    
 I don t know why people are complaing so much about heating  Even i have a galaxy note 4 and it gets as heated as the le 1s which is perfectly normal.
these are excited people who give review without trying to solve problem once.
at least 5 people got confused if it is Iphone.
Not that bad as people are criticising it in their reviews.
On whole this was my experience of 1 week with the LeTv Le 1S   it is value for money don t listen to dummies there will always be negative people who are never satisfied and misguides with their negative reviews.
some people wrong review in this phone but I really true review in this phone.
 These people are worst for after sales services.
As most of the lucky people have spoken about the good and bad about the product  let me just put my findings.
flipkart is giving 1 month return policy but this policy is to fool people.
I dont know what other people wanted in terms of quality.
It looks premium   more costly than its price   surely it ll grab people s attention whenever you take it out of your pocket
It charges real fast and although the phone heats up a bit  it no so much that people dislike this phone.
--------------------------------------------------------
playing games  -7
General performance  10 10. never lags in multitasking n while playing heavy graphical games like nova 3 asphalt 8.
No lags when playing high end games like nfs mw real racing 3 asphalt 8 gta.
screen quality look stuning games playing smooth no hang or lagg at all camera average hope future updates may solve the issue and build quality extra ordinery in this price range.
I have played very heavy games on this phone like Injustice  Asphalt8 and NOVA but didnt faced any lag what so ever.
but believe me the maximum temperature I detected after playing heavy games for 2.
Great gaming experience I did not find any lag while playing heavy games.
During normal usage  no heavy games  the phone remains cool and the mild warmth can be attributed to its metal body.
10 day usage I found more heating problem like while charging and also if you are playing some heavy games.
High clocking speed  large usable memory makes running games such as Asphalt 8  Airborne a piece of cake
With the fast charging  playing games would definitely put load on the processor and some heat is unavoidable.
I cant say about heavy games.
one issue  it is Heating it you run the Graphics intensive games and it becomes difficult to handle in that case.
however its operations are smooth even while playing heavy games and browsing internet as well.
Battery backup is of one day with 4G  WiFi  Calls  constant browsing and little games.
I have played Asphalt 8  Mortal Kombat X  Modern Combat 5  Marvel Future Fight and other casual games on the device to test out its gaming capabilities.
The set becomes warm at 41 to 43 during charging and takes between 35 to 39 on high data usage  wifi usage and moderate games.
I dont use to play too much games.
I also played a number of heavy games to test it but the phone did not lag a bit.
1 main thing is phone is heating like a iron box when you using this mobile games wifi internet calling and any type  mobile will heat.
Heats up a bit while playing heavy games n inernet browsing .
15 apps  excluding heavy Games.  
If u are even just playing casual games or just socializing online it starts to get pretty hot.
the graphics is excellent and games work outstanding.
Used it for 4 days but never hanged and plays all the heavy games smoothly.
No hang  no lags even playing Asphalt 8 games and all heavy games.
While gaming  temperature reaches mid fifties  causing frame drops and lags  even with basic games like subway surfer  world cricket championship  yet to test with high end games
It gets heated only when it is used while charging or when some heavy games are played on it.
2 which is very fast  I have installed 120 apps including heavy games and apps and still my RAM is approx 500MB available  thought  no lag and no hanging  all apps are working smooth and fast   8 out of 10  
--------------------------------------------------------
worth every penny  7
 Worth every single penny.
Worth every penny spend.
Worth Every Penny   
Very much worth every penny you spend.
Phone is perfectly fine and worth every penny.
its indeed worth every penny .
Worth every penny.
worth every penny you spent.
--------------------------------------------------------
for first time  6
So i think complaing about heating means either people have never used a smartphone and is using for the first time or they ve no knowledge about processors and all.
Do a Factory Reset of the phone before using it for the first time.
Flipkart   i am feeling like cheated for the first time from you   
Its their software buggy as hell so much that for the first time I had to return the product.
When i switched on the phone for first time  after setting up the phone  i have received OTA update  after updating the phone.
Front camera is below average in low light but pretty average in light conditions and rear one is above average and keep in mind that it can improve via OTA  so dont be too anxious about it as its the first time for company and still camera is good.
Fast charging was not fast for the first time.
Factory Reset is must for first time  Which gives better performance like heating issue and Ram Usage.
I am using a device with finger print scanner for the first time and I am in love with it.
For the first time when I installed apps  it didn t even show up on home screen.
--------------------------------------------------------
viewing angles  6
Display has good viewing angles and UI is smooth
Brilliant FHD  1080p  display with very good viewing angles
Crisp Display  produces fantastic colors and great viewing angles
Viewing angles are great 
Viewing angles are pretty good .
Viewing angles are nice.
--------------------------------------------------------
heavy  6
But on weekends Heavy mobile usage will deplete the battery much sooner.
Multitasking easy Heavy games an issue and it doesn t heat up as many have said.
Nothing bad but a little ram heavy.
It is a little heavy but does not feel that heavy.
--------------------------------------------------------
fingerprint scanner  6
The Camera is good  Fingerprint scanner works efficiently  and the phone has amazing looks.
Great looking  fast fingerprint scanner  fast charging  responsive touch  Good colour reproduction.
Fingerprint scanner works good.
Fingerprint scanner is good.
The camera is below average when considered to the competion  Honor 5X and Lenovo K4 Note  there are couple of software issues waiting to be fixed  absence of Gyroscope might annoy and fingerprint scanner could have been more consistent.
Good fingerprint scanner.
front camera is too bad  fingerprint scanner is not working properly    most important Filpkart will not refund you.
The fingerprint scanner is very very accurate .
The fingerprint scanner is actually fantastic and is fast but sometimes pretends to not recognise your touch.
Fingerprint scanner   Exceptionally good.
Fingerprint The scanner works awesome Rating   5 5 
Fingerprint scanner is very good.
Very less phones have a fingerprint scanner in such a low range.
Fingerprint Scanner Is second good thing is in this phone.
Good working fingerprint scanner
Fingerprint scanner is prone to finger prints  finger print works in any direction we place the fingers i mean it works 360 degrees 
Le 1s boasts the world s first mirror surfaced fingerprint scanner with 6H hardness
 very poor in built quality very bad fingerprint scannersc it takes a lot of time to iunlock so do t by this product for built quality if no u can go for this product 
 Fingerprint Scanner is the one of the fastest working Scanner i ever see.
Fingerprint scanner is excellent.
Fingerprint Scanner is great.
4  Excellent Fingerprint scanner  I simply love this feature.
--------------------------------------------------------
in price range  6
 Awesome phone in this price range good battery back up finger print working fine and fast charging is very useful over all good phone 
 Good one for the price range.
Best in price range and Fabulous look
Only look and performance is good  otherwise you will get many good options in same price range.
look out for other phones at this price range and you wont regret.
The videos are fine but focusing time is a bit high compared to other phones in the same price range.
So  overall this gadget is Super one for this price range totally worth every penny 
phone is very good in price range .
Overall this is the best phone in this range  if you want something better then go for the lenovo vibe x3  it has similar performance but better camera  better speakers and of course a higher price tag.
Lenovo K4 Note is for those who want better speakers but can skimp out on the performance  in the same price range  honor 5x is for those who want better battery life  a little bit better camera and can deal with a laggy interface  and as for me  personally  I can t deal with a phone which whimpers on its way to my facebook page.
other than in this price range phone is awesome 
4  Battery backup  Battery backup is pretty good i had played COC for 3 hour and the battery drain from 84  to 69 which is enough for this price range.
--------------------------------------------------------
3gb ram  5
3GB Ram  Free ram is quit low  
3gb ram available and camera is like vga thinking to return soon 
Awesome phone specially for those having low budget with extra smart features like 3gb ram  full metal body and nice processor .
Helio X10 and 3GB of ram is just perfect.
The phone comes with 3GB of RAM  dual.
As usual 3gb Ram  Working fine without lag  Which was nice .
Out of 3GB  available ram 1.
--------------------------------------------------------
lenovo k4 note  -5
better than redmi note 3 .
Igaming exp is too smooth and butterly far better than lenevo k4 note
and its better than xiaomi redmi note 3 everthing just except the ui xiaomi has a very good interface 
I can say this phone is far better than K4 Note in terms of built quality  screen quality and processor performance.
instead of bying le 1s we can go for lenova K4 note.
 I found it the next alternative best to redmi note 3 and lenovo k4 note  in terms of design and all departments but lacks that importance for camera where it needs a drastic improvement almost in every aspect of camera details  heating was nominal but worse while charging 
Voice is also nice  less than k4 note but still nice   
Before buying this I bought HONOR 5x cause I thought it would be better than K4 note  Le 1s  RN 3.
But please note it shouldn t bother many users as the heating is very rare and happens on the top section  away from the part where you will hold the mobile.
--------------------------------------------------------
letv  -5
my sister have redmi note 3 and brother have k4 note  which are the true competitors of this phone  but letv is much better than their ones.
me Compare camera with Mi4i and found that LETV 1S is More Powerful 
 I have used Letv last two days.
Look premium 10 10  display 9 10  fingerprints scanner 9 10  camera average not to bad 7 10  performance 10 10  overall letv le1s is premium brand in 11k value for money 
I requested for replacement option and got new letv le 1s phone.
As Letv is new to market i bought the phone by believing on flipkart  great support and easy returns   .
I heard about Letv first time and took the risk.
The user interference is not that amazing cause Letv is new entrant into smartphone world and it will take time to adjust for them to improvise 
letv best phone.
Following are very good in Letv Le 1S 
I think this feature is only compatible with LeTv charger only. 
under Sunlight legibility is good with 500nits brightness of the display   We can change the display colour  saturation with 4 color modes available such as letv  vid   natural   soft .
 Last week i brought a new Letv Le 1s Phone with lot of dream in mind.
I would recommend everyone to wait until Letv fix issues.
if Letv wants eat hen  let them its one time  but if they are serious they will do something for it  lets wait if 21st feb gets you an update on EUI  and it resolves mainly heating camera and other issues.
My old Lenovo A7000 purchased from Flipkart in April  2015 is much better than Letv Le 1S because the above mentioned issues are not there.
Heating is high so need update on this from Letv to get this resolved earliest.
Overall letv did t let me down.
over all   i think letv is improve this problem to enter in indian market  
Letv is excellent mobile in this price segment.
over all   i think letv is improve this problem  Expand  
very good EUI specially made by Letv similar to Iphone
Coolpad is much better than LETV LE 1S and K4 not.
I would thank LETV for such a good support.
After a very big long time got my new LeTV phone.
--------------------------------------------------------
premium  5
Stunning   super cool premium looks for which i fell for this mobile 
Design is not only premium but also very sturdy which stands out in the crowd .
Because of the poor battery life the whole Premium feel of the phone gets lost.
The phone looks extremely stylish and premium.
The phone really feels premium in hand .
The look and feel of the phone is very much premium .
The phone has very good premium looks which is second to none with an all metal body
The display is vibrant and feels premium.
--------------------------------------------------------
for price range  5
Overall this is the best phone in this range  if you want something better then go for the lenovo vibe x3  it has similar performance but better camera  better speakers and of course a higher price tag.
Only look and performance is good  otherwise you will get many good options in same price range.
look out for other phones at this price range and you wont regret.
So  overall this gadget is Super one for this price range totally worth every penny 
4  Battery backup  Battery backup is pretty good i had played COC for 3 hour and the battery drain from 84  to 69 which is enough for this price range.
Lenovo K4 Note is for those who want better speakers but can skimp out on the performance  in the same price range  honor 5x is for those who want better battery life  a little bit better camera and can deal with a laggy interface  and as for me  personally  I can t deal with a phone which whimpers on its way to my facebook page.
 Good one for the price range.
--------------------------------------------------------
cons  -5
If you read this review and still you want to buy then after receiving mobile check all above cons with it on first day only dont go on premium looks.
Still not able to find any cons about battery camera .
I was little worried about major cons .
Except this there s no other cons of this device.
First Cons   Camera behaves like 5MP and Display in Bright Light not visible much.
--------------------------------------------------------
3 gb ram  4
4 GB RAM free out of 3 GB.
When ever i uses 2 or 3 small apps like whatsapp   fb   messenger   hike then it shows only 300 ram available of 3 gb.
another is its RAM space is less than other 3 GB phones.
3gb ram available and camera is like vga thinking to return soon 
3 gb of RAM free.
Awesome phone specially for those having low budget with extra smart features like 3gb ram  full metal body and nice processor .
3 GB Ram is very good for fast processing.
Poor RAM management  out of 3 GB ram we get only 1 GB ram for free.
3GB Ram  Free ram is quit low  
Helio X10 and 3GB of ram is just perfect.
same apps I installed on my previous mobile with 1 GB RAM and it always showed 300 MB free  I would say 6 GB required for this phone to manage the apps.
The phone comes with 3GB of RAM  dual.
It has 3 GB RAM but I had never seen 1  GB RAM available.
3 GB of RAM which is great for multitasking 
As usual 3gb Ram  Working fine without lag  Which was nice .
Out of 3GB RAM we will get only 1 GB free  
Out of 3GB  available ram 1.
--------------------------------------------------------
review  4
Don t go for the negative review s just format the phone once you get it and charge up to 100 .
Something which no other review has covered .
I have registered with LETV with good review and purchased the product on 09 02 2016 thank you for Flipkart that they delievered with in 1 Day but after receiving and using the product for 2 Days this is my review The camera quality is worst as it s not even good compare with 3 MP mega pixel and also it s not fast charging option available on it and also having bug issue with the software when opening with applications with calendar.
This is my first review in flipkart .
Overall review Awesome Phone under this price segment.
Product i had start to use and within 24 hrs cant give justified review but overall its OK 
This is my second review after putting the instrument to use for about a week.
So here is my most honest review after 4 days of usage  
I am quite confused  how all the review sites were tight lipped about the above problems.
I got this cell in second flash sale and get in hand on 13th Feb   my honest review after using it 5 days 
this is my first review on any device on flipkart.
Overall review of this phone is below average.
See you soon with good review of the phone.
I will give my full review after using for few more days  
mixed review on this.
It is little heating up initially may be because of metal body i guess overall worth for money just go for it  let me try to use it for one week and write detailed review.
I hope my review was helpful.
Read the whole review before judging it.
I would write soon full review soon with need improvements.
This is a genuine review just to help u guys out 
I am providing my full review after using it for about one month now.
some people wrong review in this phone but I really true review in this phone.
This is the very genuine review i am writing about this phone.
--------------------------------------------------------
pros  4
pros  good design and comfortable to hold  good performance and the fingerprint feature is good too
Despite of the cons there are pretty good pros for this mobile.
If you are okay with above problems  you can buy it wit the following pros 
 Pros  full hd display is good.
--------------------------------------------------------
usb type c  -4
Type C USB is rare and one has to carry charger everywhere.
same type of phone without finger pring Gionee s6 cost is 20k.
BUT  it seems that i took many photos but they didnt came that much good as LeEco promised  the FlagShip Le1s is obviously has a good camera but the Retail unit is very disappointing as the picture was not sharp enough and that is not an a high quality 4k video  as well as the Slo Mo is ok ok type Resolution  but the HDR mode did some great photos.
Type C USB with fast charging really works excellent and takes an hour to charge 100 .
--------------------------------------------------------
apps  4
2 there were compatibility issue for google apps transfered using ShareIT  hope it will update over Wifi 
This phone is very good for normal users who use minimum apps  can watch videos nicely as screen is good.
I called a robot  name is basavaraj or basaveshwar  in flipkart customer care to inform about that issue  the customer care is so pathetic that he is not listening to the problem which i face  but he keeps on saying that the replacement or refund is possible only when the device crosses 45 degree celsius  infact i was not speaking about the refund or replacement  i was looking for a solution where in I can use the phone to basic purpose like calling  using apps like uber or other apps which i use for daily purpose.
When ever i uses 2 or 3 small apps like whatsapp   fb   messenger   hike then it shows only 300 ram available of 3 gb.
though it is a 3GB RAM after installing few simple apps it get down to 1.
All the features and other apps are similar.
even on regular apps   not heavy gaming apps 
The switch between apps is good .
Apps working very fine.
Apps arrangement in phone is good and no unnecessary Apps are available.
RAM is good but if u run out of it disable non usable apps manually.
The phone colors and apps are very attractive Rating   5 5 
Phone gets a bit warm while using the camera and running heavy apps.
7x available  and opened all the apps .
same apps I installed on my previous mobile with 1 GB RAM and it always showed 300 MB free  I would say 6 GB required for this phone to manage the apps.
There are google apps installed in system app so if you wan to use then no worry  but if you don t need some app thought you can t uninstall them and they are using around 150MB RAM  but I will not root  because I am not facing any lag or hanging problems  
Dnt rely on other apps.
6 GB   3 phone is hanging  4 display resolution is like karbon   so many thing and place it will write chines type   body is weak and how they make full they compair this brand with Samsung s7eage first bit how floted this type of news in what s apps and other promoting this phone by filpkart I think they are checking also now I understand filpkart also not bothered about phone qualify he only seeing his profit and making buyr full through promoting its a big example of current add on TV of filpkart 
I had opened all the apps one by one and checked memory  it went minimum 532 but no lagging  then I tried subway surfer  yes game lagged  or bit jerky not much  I downloaded around 10 other apps  and then cleaned the memory  got 1.
Switching between apps is good
while other apps of around 50 MBs were downloaded in couple of seconds  Approx.
May be I am using to much apps nowadays  But still battery is lasting at least 22.
Apps are working good not even a single app is crashed phone didn t hang till now.
--------------------------------------------------------
customer care  4
I was literally shocked then i call the customer care they listened me and accepted the refund request 
I called a robot  name is basavaraj or basaveshwar  in flipkart customer care to inform about that issue  the customer care is so pathetic that he is not listening to the problem which i face  but he keeps on saying that the replacement or refund is possible only when the device crosses 45 degree celsius  infact i was not speaking about the refund or replacement  i was looking for a solution where in I can use the phone to basic purpose like calling  using apps like uber or other apps which i use for daily purpose.
very bad customer care experince from flipkart 
i forcely reattempted the delivery again from the lucknow bluedart office and the courier guy directly contacted me on the phone he said call the customer care and give my number and i did that i called to customer care senior team gave it the phone number to them and lets wait till the evening flipkart customer care said they will going to call courier boy lets wait and will update this in the evening  CHECK BELOW FOR UPDATE  
Good customer care support  no cons only pros.
People if you have any issue regarding any product just feel free to contact to customer care they are available 24x7 but the fact that you will surely gonna solve it in harder way  P so 99  of the wrong cases which have been found is actually from the warehouse department team i mean if you would have read all the above things which i have mentioned you would have known whats the condition I am at that time  D  
--------------------------------------------------------
at price range  4
look out for other phones at this price range and you wont regret.
Lenovo K4 Note is for those who want better speakers but can skimp out on the performance  in the same price range  honor 5x is for those who want better battery life  a little bit better camera and can deal with a laggy interface  and as for me  personally  I can t deal with a phone which whimpers on its way to my facebook page.
 Awesome phone in this price range good battery back up finger print working fine and fast charging is very useful over all good phone 
4  Battery backup  Battery backup is pretty good i had played COC for 3 hour and the battery drain from 84  to 69 which is enough for this price range.
--------------------------------------------------------
works  3
Fast charging works so great.
The main camera 13 MP works great out doors and can shot slo.
3. works as a remote with ir blaster.
--------------------------------------------------------
software  -3
e. g. heating issues  battery drains very fast  software issue  camera quality not upto the mark  even cheaper phones have nice camera quality  screen is not as much good  its not crystal clear    THE MAIN THING IS THAT I REQUESTED TO RETURN THE ITEM BACK AS PER THE POILICY BUT THIS  WS RETAILER  REJECTED MY RETURN REQUEST  and says its normal if phone is heating up  But what about the quality it very poor  will never buy any thing from this seller.
Software of the mobile looks silky smooth.
5 usable or less then sooo improve software bugs 
Phone software is not good.
The software could have been better to manage the heatinng issues given that the it s a metal body.
Software  Not good as expected.
Perfectly build quality and perfect software for the device.
But after some day usage I found a red stuck pixel in phone and I try almost possible way to fix it with available software or fixers but can t able to fix it.
Sixth  the software  original culprit.
but there are problems like camera quality is very poor minor software bug.
in software is good.
6 10  Software is easy to use.
However I finally decided against it as I like the look of my 1s better than Note 3 and expecting some of the issues mentioned above would be fixed with future software updates.
I dont have high expectations from LeEco for their after sales support or any future software upgrades or support 
Software was very simple as compared to Samsung and not so interesting but good.
Haven t visited a service center as of now  but had a talk with Letv Customer Care regarding some minor software bug.
Software is simple and user friendly  inspired by ios 
Fingerprints lock is very good and Software is very good.
1. after citing all above issues i still loved the beauty piece as these are simple software related issues which can be fixed up in a later updates
Good hardware but software not good.
May be due poor placements of microphones on bad software.
The Le 1s will give you a brilliant looking device with a fantastic display  near perfect software experience with awesome performance.
Hope there will be consistent software support.
The credit goes to the software as well as it is very fluid and responsive and does not have any major bugs.
but i think its software problem and can be resolved in future.
But worst software and UI.
Small software issues 
you will never get x. GB said ram free in your any device  it is the requirement to run your mobile basic software OS  standard apps  etc.
--------------------------------------------------------
full metal body  3
the phone do heats up  but not so high as said by many users  while charging i didn t see a huge difference between the phones temperature yes if you use your phone while charging  it will obviously heat up  any phone will heat up if you do that  buts its okay  its not a big issue in this full metal unibody phone  camera was average when i brought it  but after the update  i got a very good camera  its not so bad  its pretty good for selfies and outdoor shooting  also lowlight is average 
12 mins  i felt heat increasing but again in my personal opinion   this may be normal with full metal body design.
Looks fantastic with full metal body.
and the full metal body gives it a gkow.
full metal body.
 great mobile day by day use performance going to peak level display sound battery back up  everything great and i cant get any heating issue still now some time it will show because its full metal body buy it 
good working but heating problem due to full metal body  
--------------------------------------------------------
ir blaster  3
IR blaster is good 
he IR blaster working perfectly with any IR compatible devices.
5 IR blaster works fine with all my household electronics  but limited to using the inbuilt app only 
--------------------------------------------------------
day to day  -3
I knew about the heating issue and it is almost tolerable  but I cant go the entire day on a single charge.
Now coming to service provided  last week mobile touchpad stopped working  and the next day I took it to a service center near marathalli  Bangalore.
Battery backup  need to charge atleast twice a day if I play game  else single charging per day is sufficient.
On the first day i charged the phone upto 80  in the night and to my surprise by next morning it was 20 .
About PHONE  I m really happy and feel proud to have this phone on first day.
Second day I get a phone call from Flipkart s customer care they ask me to run this app and then they run a display test.
But after some day usage I found a red stuck pixel in phone and I try almost possible way to fix it with available software or fixers but can t able to fix it.
I got around 4 hrs of screen on time from that 3000 mah battery  this one has been giving me around 4 hrs to 4 hr 15 mins of screen on time from 100  to 10  charge  while having cellular data on the whole day  gps and wifi switched off.
 great mobile day by day use performance going to peak level display sound battery back up  everything great and i cant get any heating issue still now some time it will show because its full metal body buy it 
The only reason for me to buy this fone was flipkart as I ve been regularly purchasing stuff from here and the quality of products were also good but now I think it s getting atrocious day by day.
If you read this review and still you want to buy then after receiving mobile check all above cons with it on first day only dont go on premium looks.
Accordingly  I have decided to return the product on next day  04.
The photos are not crisp and even in the broad day light  there is some noise in the photos.
For the whole day usage of about 2 to 3 hours   the battery drains about 20.
15 minutes of whatspp I need to charge this phone for entire day.
Now the battery  you have to keep your powerbank handy  if you want to keep the phone alive for a single day with 2G enabled.
Camera is good  Day light camera is awesome   dim light is ok ok   front is ok ok but day light photos are awesome also provides you blurred effect if you know how to focus things correctly
I called customer service to provide me with the address of the EKART or their number where the product was held so we can pick up because the next day was also a college working day.
From the first day Back key is auto worked.
1 camera is average but not good as compare to build quality but as per price it is good  2 battery problem not there u can use it for whole normal day.
In weekdays a full charge with a busy schedule with not much time to use the Mobile it would easily last a day.
Got it on the next day itself  Thumbs up to Flipkart.
In very first day when i recieved this i got to know that i have to return this phone.
On the next day  having being faced the similar unsatisfactory performance of the product  I have lodged the return request on 05.
the next very step i did within a half day usage is login to flipkart and clcik on return button.
--------------------------------------------------------
charger  -3
Any phone gets warm while getting charged especially with a fast charger.
Flipkart was quick to deliver  the packaging was like an I phone 6  the charger works beautifully fast and the interface is very cool.
2A other brand mibile charger and same original USB cable no heat and battery stands more longer with this.
But yes  on fast charging it gets hot than average so i prefer using my old charger adapter.
Quick charger bundled along is beautiful and very effective.
The Savior comes in the form of fast charger that comes in the box charges the phone for 10  to 89  in just 45 mins.
The phone charger is not a universal charger.
With C. type charger fast charging is commendable
Phone comes with 2000mah charger  what for others is fast charger.
And yes the fast charger.
The supplied charger is one of the best so far and even charges the Le 1S faster than my Galaxy S .
May be a different charger but not a fast charger
but  some users may have the heating issue while charging with fast charger and while playing a game.
This device has USB type C port   an awesome charger that charges the device from 0.
Charger is too bulky and heavy but it does its job well 
2. phone has not a portable charger 
--------------------------------------------------------
redmi note  -2
better than redmi note 3 .
and its better than xiaomi redmi note 3 everthing just except the ui xiaomi has a very good interface 
 I found it the next alternative best to redmi note 3 and lenovo k4 note  in terms of design and all departments but lacks that importance for camera where it needs a drastic improvement almost in every aspect of camera details  heating was nominal but worse while charging 
--------------------------------------------------------
in low light  2
Camera  Average camera It takes good pics in bright daylight but the images turnout grainy when shot in low light or artificial light.
It struggles a bit in low light but still clicks decent photos.
Camera is not that great in low light.
2. camera quality is not good in low light.
Camera in low light is not great.
Only camera is little bad in low light .
This phone is not that great and camera quality is bad  in low light captured images are dark  insufficient flash for capturing images in low light.
1 Camera quality of both rear and front is pathetic while indoor and under low light.
camera is not up to the mark it struggle in low light also the front camera is not so good but outdoors picture quality is good 
Low light photos can be improved with little trick and setting but OS improvements are necessary.
Gets good amount of details even in low light.
Even the high end phones and cameras will struggle in low light.
Camera clarity is worst I have ever seen  I can t even think to open camera specially in low light.
but not in low light.
8. camera is descent in low light but in natural light is too good 
Currently images in low light are not images only its very bad.
If you are a photography lover  than this is not for you  i mean in day light camera performance is above average and low light it is average i give 7 10.
CAMERA  its camera is aswm in outdoor condition and it takes some decent pictures in also indoor condition but some tym it lags in low light which u can ignore but no phone in this range can give u 4k recording and slow motion recordings so camera is 7 10  
Camera  Main camera is very good in good light and in very low light camera is average.
It lags in low light photos poor ram management.
The camera struggles a bit in low light and artificial lighting conditions but it takes decent pictures in outdoor lighting conditions.
Did not expect good result form this phone s camera in low light.
below average in low light.
Camera  it s probably the weakest part of the camera in low light but strongest part in good lighting conditions.
Better not to discuss about low light photo which is horrible  but  flash light  even though it is single  manged to get a better photo.
And the camera picture quality is worst in low light conditions  which makes you not to rely on this phone camera when you go out for a trip.
cam in low light is not good.
Front camera is below average in low light but pretty average in light conditions and rear one is above average and keep in mind that it can improve via OTA  so dont be too anxious about it as its the first time for company and still camera is good.
It s a blind eye buy if one is not interested shooting in low light and don t care about battery backup.
--------------------------------------------------------
hours  2
Heavy usage with mobile data on it will almost last a 10 hours not more.
5 full hours to charge   ever 2 min 1  discharge.
thanks to flipkart for delivering this product with 19 hours awesome  
After 24 hours usage  
10 hours which is quite average in terms of 3000mah battery.
started the experience by delivering the product in 24 hours flat  and it s been a great ride since.
 Today i got the phone  using it since last 2 hours  nice design  and no lagging  camera also good for me.
--------------------------------------------------------
double tap  -2
No gesture  no double tap etc.
 Need gesture like double tap to wake the phone instead pressing the power button always
--------------------------------------------------------
excellent  2
The mobile looked premium  Excellent built .
Type C USB with fast charging really works excellent and takes an hour to charge 100 .
--------------------------------------------------------
a factory reset  -2
Phone works really well and didn t face any major problems as i updated and did factory reset as soon as i took it out of box.
after last update and factory reset it is fine now.
My question to flip kart and letv why i should do nonse like factory reset and other and reinstall all apps which were installed already why i should waste my time and who will pay data charges.
--------------------------------------------------------
1 gb ram  -2
RAm almost 1 gb free good enough for processing.
1 GB ram remains free most of the times when you don t have too many apps running.
Poor RAM management  out of 3 GB ram we get only 1 GB ram for free.
Helio X10 and 3GB of ram is just perfect.
same apps I installed on my previous mobile with 1 GB RAM and it always showed 300 MB free  I would say 6 GB required for this phone to manage the apps.
12 apps open  1GB ram is left and the fast processor makes switching between apps quite a smooth task.
More than 1 GB RAM is generally free while 4.
It has 3 GB RAM but I had never seen 1  GB RAM available.
only 1 gb ram is available 
1 GB RAM free.
Out of 3GB RAM we will get only 1 GB free  
Out of 3GB  available ram 1.
--------------------------------------------------------
first flash sale  -2
Purchased the phone during first flash sale.
 I have purchased this phone on first flash sale.
Dont rush for flash sale  I did mistake in buying this phone in first flash sale  .
I bought this phone during first flash sale and Flipkart delivered it well within the time.
I bought this phone in the first flash sale and Flipkart has delivered the phone next day  thanks to Flipkart.
i purchased le 1s in first flash sale after 10 days of usage i have no interest use this kind of device.
Able to get hold of this mobile in first flash sale after desperately waiting for this mobile for over a month.
after my failured first attempt bought it on my second attempt in flash sale.
I got this phone on the 3rd flash sale after missing out on the first two.
--------------------------------------------------------
wide angle  -2
5. the wide angle lens fr front cam .
I like the wide angle feature in front camera.
--------------------------------------------------------
worth for money  1
Overall worth of its price.
except all this mobile is really worth for money.
It is surely worth for the money you are paying.
Very much worth every penny you spend.
Not worth for the money.
Good worth for money spent 
Overall its worth.
--------------------------------------------------------
initial impressions  1
OK my initial impressions
--------------------------------------------------------
dead trigger  -1
10 10  All high end games like Asphalt 8  dead trigger 2 plays smoothly with high display settings.
--------------------------------------------------------
2 days  1
Initially  I thought it looks beautiful and looks amazing but after using it for 2 days I started to hate it and It started to look UGLY and useless.
In first 2 days battery drain very fast.
ive been using this for last 2 days  received in second flipkart flash sale .
But  if you switch on the battery saving mode  then it will last for 2 days without any charge for normal moderate Use.
Over all my experience has been positive so far after 2. days  and i recommend it to the person who is looking for a budget smart phone with cutting edge technology.
32GB is enough these days as google backups most of our pictures.
Light usage 2 days easily
--------------------------------------------------------
at price point  -1
I was amazed to see that this mobile had similar or higher features at a lower price point.
--------------------------------------------------------
mega pixel  1
 My touch button mobile without any mega pixel is better than 13mp of LeTv.
--------------------------------------------------------
awesome  -1
Look and Feel are Awesome  cant get any better 
OVERALL AWESOME PHONE IN 11K some issue should be solved by letv in upcoming updates  
Finger print scanner works fine  this makes this device awesome.
 Awesome great le 1s this present situation with reasonable price good camara good battery  good display  overall performance is very good loving this mobile thank you le Eco bring more good devices to India .
--------------------------------------------------------
need  -1
It has adaptable IR Blaster u can set for any remote all u need to play with it
Camera 6 10 Average  need to update the camera
i don t need to do any thing in screen the phone will do every thing.
Also  once at the time of real need this phone got turned off direct from 15  battery which had its repercussions but that there sort of lost my trust.
I could not use same as need a Volte mobile.
29 GB of user memory out of 32GB is sufficient   there is no need for additional Micro SD Card.
3 days easily without the need of charging  impressive.
--------------------------------------------------------
amazing  1
Looks Amazing  best thing about this phone.
--------------------------------------------------------
in first flash  1
I have booked successfully LE 1S in first flash sell and I got it as soon as possible 
--------------------------------------------------------
due to metal  1
good working but heating problem due to full metal body  
--------------------------------------------------------
user  -1
and coming to the battery  battery life is not enough for me  as i am a heavy user  but fast charging makes it enough  its charging speed is superb  within 1 hour i get full battery i. e. 99  
Any new user will not feel any difference in interface.
After having used this phone for about 15 days  I can definitely say that it offers a nice user experience.
For an average user like me the battery is overall good which could last for entire working day.
i am a heavy user of smartphone  
 I am a heavy user  of.
Enough for an average user 
Im not a heavy user of mobiles.
Honestly if u r a heavy user like me still u can use this for at least 6 hours screen on tym 
I am not an avid user of camera  I just want to click decent pictures sometimes.
I am an average user with calls  sms  email and social media.
UI is pretty new for me and for a normal user for me  it is good.
Above two things disappointed me a lot since as an average mobile user I mainly need a phone with good battery life and good camera quality.
Happy user     
but as a daily user i am happy with this Letv  
You have to be satisfy with 25gb user available memory only.
very poor User interface.
If you are a moderate user of mobile phones  you will defenitely love it  No regrets.
An average user can keep it without charging till 1 .
Not an user friendly ui.
You get 24 GB user available non.
not for heavy user.
--------------------------------------------------------
well  1
Please take care of the mobile well.